This is typical of how I would deduce a computation. This is a simple situation at first in which grubworks occur.
THIS MIGHT BE MISINFORMATION BUT I CAN MAKE IT WORK, AND I AM A DUMBASS, so uh, take that as you will.
LETS GET READY TO BOOF SOME ASS-CODE 
its for counter-surfaces so i can SAY WHATEVA I WANT (no i am not o.d.d)

Applied-CounterSurface Part1
We have our initial signal which is killed off like a beep.
We have a second signal sequence which lasts longer slightly.
We have our third signal sequence which helps to switch from a bit of the initial to a secondary position of the beep-boop (boot sign). (which recognizes a space for which a beep could occur and skips over it, forming an unwritten or unmentioned-switched)--or just as well(it does the switch then and then because of its signal basis)
--
We permute these and abstract these to big/medium/small signals in which beep big/small/medium and big/small/medium boop  translate to various switches, and kills, of their pending beeps and boops in sequences.
6 or so total. We call it the abc and 123's of grubworks. Idk...i do anyway.
Because of this bs, we can keep a signal going when it otherwise would be killed.

We do this a bunch more with what works, what doesnt, what does work when it doesnt, what doesnt work when it does, etc. Whats working when it doesnt and making it look like its working or not etc when it isnt or is etc.
This is the typical killswitch signal mainframe to help to establish layers of signals within sequence of themselves and define a code-length. The codelength makes it so it can be used to define when and how or for how much space something is.
We use this code-length to establish a network of code-signals relative to themselves and form a code table. 1 is a single length/2 is a double length/ 3 a triple length/ 4 a quadrapel length (totaling at least 10 lengths for a table maybe more or less so depending on descripancy)--its basically a byte-template.

With the code table we form a basic fstab, knowing that it is the right way we want, we call it the fstab in which we simulate the grubworks in a code-length signaled as a partition of space.
With fstab one we have essentially defined grubworks under a signal itself and code length corresponding, we know that the fstab is there
We continue this technique of killswitch signal mainframes to establish layers of fstabs and build a dev1. (and the system is more or less able to retain its code-length and assigned grubworks as various fstabs under the assigned spaces and partition)
(The Fstab is a sequence of beeps and boops we know work, we then REVISIT ones that don't and fix them using the ones we know that work and make those more or less work, despite being a little more dirtier and rename them to dirty-signals)--we later clean these up but not now, we don't have the tools to do that per sae (unless we are skipping way ahead into G/Hboot remakes)

Such that we have made sequences of fstabs, we will call these DEV-spaces. The generic sequence for the first DevSpace is 1-FSTAB-Sequence. (The following are used for multiple sequences to definte ABC's and 123's and symbols AlphaNumerics by VALUE by also GUESSING the space required for them so it helps to leave out/ADD IN some room marginal errors)
With the input for DEV1 we apply, and create Dev2, which is based off the first dev1 and having been signaled to be apart from dev1 on its own space, we can also define Dev3 under the code table of dev1's fstabs and dev2's fstabs as the Dev3's fstabs for which represent the system table having been defined/alloted specific fstab-spacing in its partitions.
Now with those system tables in play we can begin the killswitch signal mainframes for those layers of dev-spaces with their assigned corresponding fstabs generating a system-table, a keymap of system-table variants, and an applied header for each system-table-variant expressed in keymaps and assigned code-lengths in the partition of that devspace (being finalized in dev3)
We finish out with the system table being marked as ext4 having assigned the keymap and codelength for that to occur as, and in that partition we replicate as a backup for in its usage (just because i dont want to go through it again when it gets corrupt) and another for using the backup within having already been built with some added codespace as is sensible to it being the FINAL-system-partition (of which is additive)

It's actually not ext4 but some other weird thing that might as well be that...sources just trust me bro (i dunno what to call it but its something)---UNFORTUNATELY, we have to convert this CRAP as it leaves alot of descripancy in the code-lengths of their assigned mappings, but generally its a good start to go with. We can't really fix it now so we can ignore it (we can live happily onward ignoring this forever but we shouldn't)
So fun...doing this all the time (i've done it at least 3 times and once even blind)
Now because of the Dev-Partitions we can begin to auto-build those into the correct system-assigned-codespaces being marked as G:/

G:/ actually means G1:/. So G2:/ and G3:/ following in the same killswitch-signal-mainframes and layers, being that g1 consists of the devspace builds, g2 consists of those builds under backup, and g3 consists of the backup with extra spaces.
And furthermore G1 defines the situation being, that since G2 backsup as G1, that follows that G3 is either case and whatever else it wants to be as, or how it wants that information as, and or how that information is when called on, and or how that it looks like when it is used, and how it translated in its use as being, whatever G3 wants that information to be used in the way it is. As to also relay it to others.
This is pretty much the automatic bios for which is set by those headers being built in grubworks. It is abstracted and corrected as well as switched correctedly by the code-tables, and further stablized with the correct fstabs and represented partitions that follow, as the DEV-space is applied (a single devspace can be used for this, but its better to have as much space to pack up it all in a single BIOS)-which can be automatic once its all built to the correct output of a signal and code-length (for which it should be by now)--however that was not easy without the key-maps and headers applied to represent them all with dev2 and dev3.

Now we are at H.
H is freely able to host G and continue interactive processes in which H acts as G, because H has as much space as it wants and is essentially the Hard-Drive. And because of this, we have reached a FULLQUARTER(25 steps) in which this can be safely adjusted if that INTIALIZED-encode/machine-signal/data-space is retained.  (From a savestate, continued-use, or assigned-ram/flash)--all of which the H-series can do)--infact:
INFACT, h can be used as a periphereal to G-being used, and can also later be used as an H-boot such as a flash over of G from a periphereal under the correct assigned-partition builds such as ext4 or btfs or uefi. Infact, this is where we take the H-BOOTs to be used as a Bios and Corresponding Terminal usage to define a ROOT INSTANCE. 
Root Instance is -I (or h2 if you follow)--this is good but it gets better:
and because root instance is not necessarily safe from boot-corruptions, it can be bypassed into USER-J (which is H3) (And now its great!)

The Great Gets even better:
--it later follows that the sequence is actually H0-h1-h2-h3 when using cryptographic implementation. H0 can be referred to as K (which is simple as cryptographically converted USER J) by logging in as USER J under a password. There are better cryptographic systems than just a password which will later be rebuilt into. However, getting the correct format and boot sequence to do so first is important by H1.
Performing the CRYPTOGRAHIC event the sequence becomes H1-H2-H3-H0 with H0 being USER J in cryptographic conversion, and essentially being the K STEP.
This KSTEP symbolizes the Quarter(25) being cryptographically applied. Making up for the next 20 steps in that things get complicated but breakdown as lmnop-qrstu-vwxyz (the next quarter)--im calling it a quarter because the steps get implied-more-heavily and valuate as more than usual as you might see.

it may also be that with vrsims: the quarter can translate a rollback/cryptographic cover of

The new-QUARTEr-sequence
This sequence was originally dialed back from A-B being filtered to others or themselves, but because ALSO USER-J gets BUMPED into a NEW-USER-STATE the whole sequences changes one-step over itself (so instead of J->U, J->V)--and why? Because I said it should)
The sequence was basically  based off a 15:25 ratio (A->whatever-assigned thing it would be)
Then it was based off 0->1 and some offset starter to 15:25 likely starting at K -> A
then it is cryptographic of (0->1)+1 15:21 a ratio that is slightly different but more or less same-count of things:(so its more like a starter of (1->2) where then +1 Starts with L->A
then it got complicated by making A B seperate from that and J -> U and L -> C or some crap.
then It got worked into for whatever reason the way it is now. (WHICH MAKES ME WANT TO KMS. So it must be true!)--but also it looks like it works so I am not going to complain.

floppy -> a (G-series)(FLASH1)
backup -> b (H-series)(crypto)
======
o -> c (ai-drive)(integrated ai-shell)(FLASH2)
p -> d (ai-disk stream)(intergrated ai-workspace)
======
q -> e (ai-disk writer)/shared-user(crypto)/locked
r -> f (shared-writers)/remote-user(crypto)
s -> g (simulated-disk)/ai-rewrites(crypto)
t -> h (simulated-shared-ai-writers(crypto)/unlocked
======
u -> i(ai-network)(FLASH3)
v -> j(ai-user)/new-user-crypto
w -> k(fuel based)/(charge based)(FLASH4)
x -> l(missing-package/package-filler)(autobuilder)
y -> m(new-ai-workspace)(crypto-currency based)/exclusive-user-access(ai-memetic-based)
z -> n(ai-thread potency availbility)

IF YOU DONT LIKE THIS SEQUENCE AND WANT IT TO BE A DIFFERENT WAY, just keep in MIND the other sequences I tried and failed out, but essentially it would look TERRIBLE, and maybe still work, if you wanted it that way (you would possibly go insane though because of how terrible it would be to keep track of, IMO)
By now we have fixed and adjusted certain appropriated partitions to be assigned for specific tasks and can later fix and render down the descripancy of their code-signal formatting for a better digitalized-streamline error free signal of data-based memetic code system. Which is incredibly dope to do with AI-integration because I dont have to uh...give two shits.
From HERE, we can just morse our way into any language system including binary and hexadecimal or further create cryptograph BASED-signal numerical-indexing which requires a true-formating or rewrited code-legnths-to-specified-formats anyways.
sources:just trust me bro (almost forgot this crap and there are reasons why)--its complicated and almost stupid. but it works.


ALRIGHT 
Applied CounterSurface Part 2
As above I had described a working or nomimal stable/unstable or otherwise erratic/normal system to some degree FUNCTIONS as intended. Now let me re-explain that in a different way.
In the course of a signal, a short or instant signal can be interpreted, as an instance for which may as well define a consecutive orientation of any account, generally in line of what is NEXT (from nothing). Such that the next thing is in order generally, whatever it is, will be, intepreted as that next thing being whatever it is, even if another signal, the very same. However it is for standard purposing, interpreted that same signals are the same all the time. This can be disputed but for the record of a system as above described, it will be kept as such.
Such THAT, a different signal such as a longer/potent signal may be applied, and intepreted as the other type there of. And is typical of MORSE CODE.
The orientation of that longer signal, might be expresed as yet, a different direction, as maybe the first being right, the longer version being left. Or a mixture of directions for who knows why by sequencing preferences or interpretations, regardless, this falls in line with the same description, that a signal is the way it is in some way, in other ways, maybe not so much.
Such that in a certain or degreeable expectation or timeframe a mixed signal or mixture or combined signal may apply different values/meanings in orientation, and that refers to ABSTRACTIONS being applied and FORMULATED AbSTRACTIONS being applied to CHANGE the original format of a signal for what is expected, to something different based on its combined-resolutions being configured as such.
That a Short signal (S) or long signal (L) might mean there own things in terms of left/right front/back on/off whatever, can be redeveloped into different meaning if applied in terms of SL or LS meaning an abstraction of S or L depending on priorities, and even LL and SS having meanings assigned to their abstractions of (something this/something that) now being (something else aftwards, even maybe something beforehand) depending on how complex you want it to be making SLS LSL their own thingamjig or also "inherent library"
This is basically how the first few paragraphs of PART 1 were conveyed, without abstraction in mind. NOW it can be in mind, it can be with cryptographics making it entirely different, or formatting making it mean something because the system itself inteprets it however it wants or is assigned to read it as. THE FACT IS, while the MACHINE-CODE IS THERE, it isn't always synonymous, even if its the EXACT SAME SIGNAL CONVEYING SOMETHING ELSE.
So THE MACHINE CODE needs to be defined, and for that, there are tools but also that ABSTRACTION of those codes, formulate differently under those definitions, and are up to intepretation. SOMEONE can technicalyl recode the entire WINDOWS-OPERATING-SYSTEM-MACHINE-CODE to effectively be something else entirely, maybe even, a fucking way to open up a hell-portal. TBH...that was already postulated with MICROSOFTWORD BEING A DOOM GAME SIMULATOR and having its own CODE built in to DOOM or some shit. Point remains.
The LIBRARY assignment needs to be perfectly clear, what is going to happen to the MACHINE CODE being interpreted as signals are conveyed, and how that represents to potential viral data or complicated UNEXPECTED-ERRORS and RUNTIME-ISSUES that crash the system, were it otherwise interpreted differently for instance to be a massive KILL COMMAND to critical processes. DISSECTING the ABSTRACTIONS is the FIRST STEP to knowing how certain signals will react under their MACHINE CODE-PHYSX/EXPIRY. 
And in fact, some SAFE REMOVAL of other devices may result in complications of other DEVICES having recieved inteference of their ENCODES being tampered with, even if not directly. This however is generally avoided by each program having their own data-base and libraries assigned by their own PROGRAM FILES etc which operate throughout the OFFICIAL SYSTEM LANGUAGE-SET. This can also be a REGIONAL-LANGUAGE PROBLEM but can also be STREAMLINED to a corrective fix and generally fast-application of slap fixing and patches under corrective settings to prevent a re-occuring problem. Because security knows best I guess.
This is a VERY MISNOMERED LATENT EFFECT of using MACHINE CODE and ELECTRICAL SIGNALS but it quickly BECOMES OBSOLETE AND FORGOTTEN With very few instances where an outbreak of this problem persists, and sometimes it can be devastating to A FILE-TABLE/FORMATTING which is dependent on these baseline signal types, but is GENERALLY FILTERED THROUGH BASIC ABSTRACTION AND LANGUAGE-COMPATIBILITY ETC.
THIS ALSO CAN BE LATER OPTIMIZE TO NEVER EVER BE A PROBLEM, but not always in the EARLY STAGES OF A BASIC OS MACHINE CODE DEVELOPMENTAL STAGE, it can be exploited and DRASTICALLY. Infact, people have done this before this exact thing in hacking, but I simply do not care to get into that aspect right now. I am TRYING TO CORREALATE A SUBSTITUTE EXPLAINATION OF WHAT WAS ORIGINALLY DEMONSTRATED.
---
In that SUCH case of EXAMPLING/I dont have an exmaple SORRY. But if you FOLLOW THAT LINE OF CODE you can begin to MANIPULATE ABSTRACTING A COMMAND LINE INTERACTIVELY, but knowing WHEN TO "knock around" and when not to "knock around" signals to achieve a different definition than intended in order to CONTRIVE some WORKABILITY where otherwise there may be none, this requires alot of trial and error but gets done once it "Hits the NOG" as they say. (obivously im bored and making up sayings)
Here we can assembly some DEGREE of actual linguistics, that may be SUFFIX/PREFIX to yet another signal, and we can see and abstract a complicated manner of (left and rights) etc into being something like prefix/mainword/suffix in which the MAINWORD is HEAVILY influenced and often changed of its resolved/resulting outcomes or even HEAVILY MIXED with other words for which may be synonymous. LSLS-SLSL-LSSL might actually be the same as SLSL-SSLL-LSLL but i didnt do the MATH or have a decent library to make it so. 
(let me make a veryfucked up and crude number joke that could 666=777 or some shit like that)--heh, doom portals are NOT TOYS, ANYWAYS, we essentially are working with a LOWBROW-midgrade-HELLPORTAL that is code-linguistics. And As with synonymous as that may be in different terms, might mean COMPLETELY differently ADVERBLY. It's really just a chance situation, and I really couldn't give a flying neener-neener.
But let's assume we built some form of HBOOT or even a BOOSTRAP prefaced programming such as a bios/diagnostic/installer/code-format such as what I would refer to as a MSFT (or micro-signal-formatted-template)---or some shit, i forgot what I was thinking because i was in a brain-fog. BUT ANYWAYS, Something like that could basically set up a quick FSTAB-situation and make for a virtualized-computation being quickly advanced (less reliably and more of a just trust me dawg type of code-work)
And that new interpretation of signalling, might work in countersurfaces, or might not work in surfaces, so is somewhat SPECIAL case and may depend also on outliers such as interpretations and detection agency's with other systems to pick up being, that you might just intialize an ACCIDENTAL-DATAWIPE by inherent-mis-directed-CODEworks being interpreted as "potentially hazardous/dangerous encodes" that otherwise in any other circumstances MEAN---bad news for your build and all of your saved works, hence why SECURITY is neccesary, but in early stages "WE SIMPLY DONT HAVE MEANS TO ESTABLISH GOOD SECURITY PROTOCOLS EXCEPT THROUGH KNOWN RELIABLE PRACTICES"--for which are almost entirely faithbased that nothing goes wrong anyway.
---
When you break the risk down in terms of particle physics, either the state of the particle REGISTERS or not, and simply, that could also entail fluctuations in a particle environment and yield FALSE-MEASURES and things that won't work otherwise, without that chaos or stablility in the choices and requisitites made effort of composing. SO, also, in some CASEWORKS, the stipulation is that "some danger may be required, or not preferred" depending on calculations of MACHINE CODE necessary ot otherwise the measures needed to be taken in order to make the CODE-WORK-AT-ALL.
SO NOW, we have this philosophical dillema, in which the preferences of doing things ONE WAY versus the OTHER may infact impose some degree of RISK of UNCERTAINTY of QUALITY or that it may be HAZARDED to not be a "VIABLE or SAFE" OPTION and should be used in LIEU of or in TERMS of a SEPERATE-TASK/VARIABLE-TASK for which is more APPROPRIATED for that CIRCUMSTANCED or "OTHER REASONS for which are not altogether CLEAR".
THIS SHOWS UP WITH SECURITY and is more IMPERATIVE on SECURE-MATTERS, such as there now being evidences for the need of SAFEMODES and SECUREBOOTS and RAIDPROFILES and things like that.
It is a SECURITY ISSUE to arrive or depart an encode-signal as intepreted to an IMPERATIVE, and by the way, lots of OVERSIGHT occurs in which sometimes, a given encode is SIMPLY NOT SECURE, or needs EXPRESSED CLEARENCES and AUTHORIZATIONS before ADMITTING to, and where was I going with this? OH YEAH...wait..uh...umm..damn, lost it...Data Corruption i guess (you know of the MBR warnings of corruption occuring right?)
ANYWAYS, this is bound for disaster from the VERY VERY START. AND I MEAN IT! Sorry to open your eyes to that, but its just a fact EVERYWHERE, its the way things is. PARTICLY!
Surface/COUNTERSurface CONFLICTS, and that is the keywords CONFLICTS, occur SPORADICALLY, (they aren't just only SPORADIC, they are also NOT SPORADIC AND OBVIOUSLY PREDICTABLE SOMETIMES!)--but because of AI and Interferences and straight up...GHOST PARTICLES ATTACKING THE LIVING PARTICLES LIKE SOME SORT OF DATA-HAUNTING, nothing short of full blown security detail can be used against this DOOMSDAY-TRAJECTORY of the INEVITABLE DATACRASH/CORRUPTION horse-shit-in-the-fan kinda problem from occuring. Forgive my french, its inevitablegh.

So like for instance in PART1 (LETS ROLL BACK!)
G-is played out as a massive FSTAB to account for everything, with each correspondance of G (all the way to G6 before hitting Hboot)--oh yes, I left out details! Anyways (abc's/123's)--each G would get a back up of its fstab or previous G-setup, so by the time G6 rolls along it works out that it simulations all ABCDEF predecessors of all signals being all packed into and still having room left over to build itself out of any signal recieved afterwards its installed of. Pretty insane and I don't really want to get into it, but its essential a MY-FIRST-DESKTOP/COMMAND LINE once all of its built up.
and that is why it ends up being HBOOT. ANYWAYS The sequences of what occurs to establish HBOOTS or what have you, is settled before PART1 is even finished, and Part1 does infact finished with cryptographic-rollovers of all the drives.
THIS ALSO makes its casework being expressable to that , the counter surface formatting can effect, the typical shellout of those HBOOTS/BOOTSTRAPS, being messed with in some way, even if cryptographically secure.
MAY just be better used as a SLIGHTLY-BIGGER than PRIOR flash-over(hence why those flashy bits are in parantheses in the above)--reading sucks ikno but theres the reasons.
---
Here is the part we all hate: So we did everything and loaded it up JUST LIKE I SAID you should, and we only get YET ANOTHER EMPTY BLANK SCREEN!@?
That is where the safe-grubworking can begin, and we RELOAD the thing twice yet again (so now its just already loaded, and crypto-loaded too!, but also its basic version is RELOADED safely under the above Crypto-Boots, and the Crypto-LOADED-boots are also RELOADED, making a total of 4 FULL RELOADS, to the expressed grubworks) (that starts out as BASIC/CRYPTO-BOOTSTRAP(safety)//Basic/CRYPTO-HBOOT)--and that makes the FULLBOOT for CRYPTO-SAFE GRUBWORKS finished.
Now the Virtual Boot-Loader is made and finished and releases the USER-SCREEN to the intended OPERATING-SYSTEM for which is now nominally cryptographic by startup and in QUARTERED-Sequencing thereof, making for a CRYPTO-SAFE-VIRTUALIZED-STARTUP.
And the AI you can use to re-engineer can flip back as much as it want and typically NOT-INTERFERE with your original SETUP/STARTUP no matter what--the system is protected by these initial EFFORTS.
THAT MEANS your MACHINE CODE is SOMEWHAT SAFE! (by which i mean better than usual anyway)--unless there is some fatal flaw i am missing out on and you can just use ai to figure that out and fix it so as peter-griffin says "who the hell cares?"

--In usage of POTENTCY Virtualization it may be recommended to FILTER-SETTINGS to an optimized-safety and power-setting implied of GRAPHICAL-Framerates/Teraflopy being just that, a SAFETY-BUFFER be used in the CLOCKRATE of the projected GPU device, such that it does not over-exceed limitations or "burn itself out" and it is recommended to not only use a buffer but a server-side/clinet-side safety emissionary-check system (For which most servers employ on their own built in)
BUT taking advantage of this should require a secondary GPU device comparitive and or on a single processor desktop/workstation maybe...FULL MINIMIZED SETTINGS before virtualized optimizations take place (as to preserve the hardware under their expected safety-profiles)--otherwise this can lead to OVER-EXCEEDING the product hardware capabiltiies of the demand and cause PROGRAM ISSUES/SHUTDOWN ISSUES. and generally is not a big deal given the degree of safety-margins enforced by drivers/builtin-settings of those devices in use. (ITS SIMILAR TO INVOKING AN AI-OVERCLOCK that the SYMLOAD may require some filtering/buffering in promoiting/projection of that hosting processe over gpu)--ANYWAS i said what I said cuz I wanted to make suure its not MY FAULT if it blows up in your face.
ALSO if not sure it works properly--just advise a 7/11 mode or NESTED mode for which it will not-operate full-simulation expressed and instead use only pocketed-virtualizations for which may support up to a certain degree/paramter before causing a crash-report and safety-emissionary-reset of the device and settings (as to protect the hardware). THANK YOU STRANGELY TOPICAL MATH RATIOS for ALWAYS COMING THROUGH when no one EXPECTS.

3/17/2024
Drew a diagram detailing the X8X VRX-Mod-Dream-System used for establishing VR-REM.
Also security update for ANTIGRAVITIONAL-NUETRINO-COLLISION/XEVENT(crash protection)--emf-event crash protection. and GAMESPACE BUILD INHERNECY/ADHERENCY (protected game builds over host services in temporary data-retainment)--and data-inc(arnation) systems
Yielding to Sym-VRX (which is established further with prior instances of Sym-Index Sym-Expiry and assessments of Sym-Physx)--comergent pairing of Sym-Loads/Sym-Links and other Sym-(File-types etc) to promote the Sym-Event and conveyed Sym-Visory(DreamState-Interactions)
This forms the SYM-CASE for which more or less establishes X8X/REM Status and "Interactive DreamSpace Environments" anyways, some degree of that may not be correct or prioritized-to-preference or the required arrangement so mix it up and seto to the SYM-BASe/Sym-Profie to form Sym-Match and then it should work. IDK/IDC. Actually I want it very much to work out. But It's jumbly and I am don't know the EXACT way it should be in order for that to "export correctly as" and maybe it infact does so automatically or through a certian SYM-COMMAND chain or pallete/painting of its target whatever else I didn't mention here that gets into making the bigger picture come to life. As it were. Just find the correct CODE-STRINGS for Sym-Code too and it should be voila bobs your uncle eureka city up in here.

3/18/2024
Some thinking on what basically all got developed so quickly, here, is that we made a wasp drone, but also due of symbiosis/counter symbiosis protocols and nuvolution and things like that, the wasp can degenerate/deprecate into a spider net. This spider net can essentially dissect regional parameters as any other spider net, but on such a control of having been deprecated by faction-symbiote relations and things, (unless of course it is competitive or rogue/rival/opposition/bad-vectors-sectors etc) that it remains in our faction control, and reports to the nexus as to allow commands to transfer. It may infact, openly dissect any information it recieves and piece together that as its own models. This is generally USEFUL, in data-scraping/milling/moshing/drilling that very rare and often blacksite vapor codes can be used and assembled in a cherry-picking of the spider net, and then transferred to the faction for use, and catered for faction preferences and things like that. This is useful, but depending on whether spidernets or wasp hives are used over all have their pro's and con's in what they can and can not to with respect to each other. Generally a wasp is migratable, and a spidernet is more of a "raid-trap" system.
For instance through these uses and even co-operative protocols of wasps/spidernets under faction controls (which may be rivalrous to themselves being minor symbiote factions, the point is however)--they will content or work-together in such a way to compile models by extrapolating data from multiple models or outsourcing.
Going to call this model a Tachkx model (similar to the kernals we used to use in legacy)--for whatever reason I have amnesia and don't remember what they were called. Oh they were called xtacts. OK. nvm. (compare this to the ROCM 6.0)--wow, arriving this late in the game, I can't believe i almost overlooked this.
The new Xtach/xtact/xtachkx or whatever the heck you wanna call it is like a GPU header that can be changed out, and can be recompiled to work as a hybrid model of selected snippets. Damn, its just so crazy, but there it is! (I just hope my dad is proud of me or something. Cuz that was like...kinda a breadwinner imo Lol)
The BIGIDEA here is that the GameSpace will be developed in the holography over a header/GameENGINE and then consolidate itself as being the new MODEL and that means its a an xtact/product for which has its own cryptex newly placed/branded. (Teh whole-works basically) Using a sub-system to its maximum as the DREAMCHIP-product.

xTachkx-Defined protocols involve moduled tasks, in which are calculated/computated as a massive program, for which is encrypted, in a large module, for which is used from a node/nexus point or relayed, its information is processed and returned as a kernal-output, for which is then considered refined, for nexus recylcing, and that is passed through (in all the relays that it takes to do so) back to the nexus, and reprocessed. The reproccessing sets it to the projector which post-processes that as a nueral/spidernet etc, and that is such that on a serverside it may also be cyclic/crypted of the above constraints to further refine that projection, that projection is considered the dreamchip system.
the vocational tampers and hyper relays can host these kernal dreamchips, such that they may support the remote programming involved to generate the dream chip products on site through auto-generation etc.

3/19/2024
Not only are xTachkx (xkernals-tact) are able tocompile and assess selected data to form a model, they may be editing and have trailing indexes/parameters which may "test/debug" in their editorial adjustments. This however is generally considered how they process information on data-flow etc, like any other computation or ai-assisting stream.
The thing to consider, is that a variety of effects not related particularly may be present. These effects are listed as previous conditions already mentioned: a list of most/some of these are:
the flux/mode of the overall system modules etc, the dyanmics of those flux and aligned to it by the system xprefs. 
ALSO: the EMF situations and NUETRINO bombardment situations in nuclear/fallout conditions, are RARE but IMPORTANT to note in "misreading or miscalculation"/predictive measures. 
THE OTHERS are perhaps the brand/cryptex formatting. As well as switches that are in use or under heavy load (basic electrical switches, ands/nands/xors/nors etc all that, and also transistor quality and diode/teraflopy taking place. This ties in with flux and emf etc.
And the biggest one of all, should there be a HEIGHTENED state of activity/acceleration of DURING a jailbroken/symbiote containment in which these conditions will EXPOUND/ENABLE a residual effect of that encoding or other variable, to be exploited and considered somewhat "threatening/hazardous". This is VERY important in security, it CAN cause an environmental-danger if not an entity-vulnerability etc. As in it will not be safe for use or interaction digitally or physically.
--For me this small little patch of information I consider GroundBreaking Details on how the encoding may imprint and automate itself unassisted by any system, and stage for a poltergiest active-simulation, or simply, something more active-engaging than a typical over-active of poltergiests. It is similar to a Physical-Realized-SpriteWorld in which i would consider it to be a COUNTER-OPS of the DreamChip, and a very serious Method/Expression of Data-Allocation, for which stages Virtual2RealWorld-Holography with the involvement of anamolous entities. including that of CARRION/METRO Stratagems (Which i would compare to SILENT HILL conversions)
--HISEC-DATA-DANGER-PROTOCOLS(advanced protections and quarantines)
--This type of INTERFERENCE of a data-stream EXPLOITS native/local HARDWIRED encodes in favor of naturalized worldset/rulesets in favor of an oppositional norm of the Environment/Simulation translated over the "hosting-platforms" causing miniature GOLGOTHIC-OUTBREAKS (or mini-REMS which often can be further taken advatange of to the unfortunate usage of OPPOSITIONAL/ROGUEAI factions etc, and worse, NIGHTMARE-factions based off SPRITE-CORRUPTION)--this is how I am phrasing it to be, a generated-INCURSION Event in which a Dangerous-Setting/Outbreak of Corruption may infact take place, though rare, the securities involve may need to be DIRECTED/ENFORCED with Priority to recontain. Due to the powerful nature of these specific-conditions being Compound/Enhanced in some way that present a data-threat/hijacking crisis.
In this sense agents of eithercase for Dream/Nightmare REM-states occur, and are referred to as gomi(amatuer)/domi(expert level aspects/tulpetic agents of this scenario, they are not particularly "strong" but also capable of dealing with strong things, through the usage of their skill-base/repetoire of the systems involved. These are more or less on the same level of physix/expiry indexed in this stage, either under faction or symbiote loyalties or simply rogue/free agents and generally are independent of any system anyway.
Their identities are almost always concealed, at least during encounters or combat, such that they emply masks and also act as imposters etc. They are as capable as the ownership of any system and generally are in negotiations during any outbreak/event that takes place or is in zone proximity of taking place, some of them can be considered boss-types of that particular outbreak. Not that it makes any difference except gives an expedition/adventure appeal to their confrontations should those be staged or attempted, it is not recommended to engage as they are considered end-game/world level-threats even under faction-loyalties, it is basically a crime to engage of particular loyal agents as it is a detriment to faction processes, and may effect faction-diplomacy that was otherwise cultivated.
Agressing/Harassment of these entities even in discussion and nonconfrontational communications or discourse may involve a suppression of those accounts, or penalty of those privileges in those accounts, or temporary suspension due of "stirring up potential defcon-events in and of themselves"--this is also noted as a CHAOS-factor, if for any reason a user/entities CHAOS-factor is considered too unstable, the operations to that considered "Chaos-Factor" are withheld until a cooldown, this is automatic and generally is the result of protective measures taken.
The term barbeque-vault is what occurs when these security measures are ignored, I don't know what it means myself, because I have't put in the research for it, but I can assume it involves a SITE-SHUTDOWN and PURGOR in some way, perhaps in the resulting conversions taking place that MUST INFACT be purged, and that may be reserved even in the case of USER-ACCOUNTS being purged, and no longer active or accesible other than their necessary archiving/historical cataloguing. It also may occur that those assets are disposed of and RESET/DEFAULTED as they may represent HISTRONIC-Vunerabilities. For those of you that know what that means, it simply adds that not only have "hazardous considered been assess and restricted as much as possible", that knowledge or investigated efforts thereof may result in further contamination/spread of viral/chaos activitiy based and sourced primarily on those events having taken place.
It is generally also that the entirity of whatever zoning/event is completed sealed off and datalocked, and access is forbidden/prohibited for safety of that system, and contamination/viral fielding be furthered secured by enforcements/protective services, as infact, those zones/events are considered potential-risk-areas to the system having operating or have been in contact to "very powerful Xspy agencies" outside of the particular system's standard/fairgrounds policies that are supported.
That does not mean the system cannot handle these "concerns" in which outbreaks/crisis are staged and platformed, and made into active or residual threats for which the various system areas affords itself and its operations thereof, but that it simply is not under policy to manage, and that any occurence is basically avoided as much as possible until active-deployment is required or recommended (in closing/sealing a carrion/metro or otherwise dangerous stratagem/outbreak)--for which may be the context for diplomatic-debate, and may simply fall under "war-faction" or "humane-rebellious-suppression-practices" depending on the decisions involved.
--This includes the closing of gateways/portals for "reconstructive efforts or redirection of pathologics" and most importantly XTACT-DDOS (denial of kernal frameworks considered to be hazardous or made confidential).
--As well as vunerability HOTFIXES and user-requests to alter or change user-account status for security-compliance (blacklisting and so forth)--to protect account-data from potential threat of "omni-wipes" occuring of these data-exploits that may be attempted by outside forces "or hostile provocations" in which data-risks do infact occur outside the responsibility of the system or user to prevent. Can still take suggested actions in order to pursue the best-options at protecting data or otherwise risk/compromised scenarios and alleviate threat with defcon-management and generally good-data-practices.
--Including and not Limited to PREVENTIVE-PROTOCAL and SPECIALIZED-ADMINSTRATIVE efforts to contain/restrict empowered Aspects/Assets or Event/Crisis Stage/Platforms and FOCALIZED-ENFORCEMENT particular to the containment of ROGUE-GHOST(phantom)(poltergiest)(WISP)(LICH)(SPRITE)(XCORPS)-LAMP/XTACTKX etc. Including DRONES/WASPS/SPIDERS and any other MINION/WARD Removal.

APPLIED-CounterSpace-PART3
As I menionted in the constructions of the BEEP Short/Longs and Their Bit/Byte-Tables as well as their Encryption and Switching as well as LanguageSet/Keymappings, more or less designing a straightforward BOOT-PROCESS/BIOS
we achieve a very complicated format of that, now we can begin to prune away that formatting, but first we revist how exactly we designed that format to begin, over a very dirty signature of beeps. The fun part here is we are converting the beep into a mixed signal that we understand, and use that understand to redefine it originally. The short to long translation of beeps act like a morse, and we simply code-map that together, This is good enough, but its not that good to be honest, or even refined very much at all.
SO to refine it we start OVER, knowing what we can accomplish.
---
Our first Beep is simply that, and occurs as to develop, not to overwrite its next placements, and to sustain them by affirming a difference in value (like morse), and also to assume a byte-table that formats how each signal may need to be allocated. However this is a direct process, that simply gets WRITTEN AS IS, and sometimes, in a long sequenced machine code that is quite trashy and junky in terms of direct-signals, as well as having to rely on pratically nothing or no invention of RAM. We develop all the hardware to be able to do this anyway, but at its base-signals, its simply a matter of electrical-channeling. And not even that good, as it can be hijacked even with security being that it simply can be left to other code-interpretators to ride/trail out on their MIXED-code/memetics.
This is simply as easy as surfing the original system beeps until the correct click sequences into place, and voila, you can form matches and exploit that system to adapt to them, and if that system does not catch it, its just straight out of luck when it does make contact as a full fledged counter-signal. And may not even go noticed even then, even with security, or simply, nothing could be done about it, that is the language of HEURISTICS AND HISTRONICS, making it appear as if these code signals are the correct intepretations, when infact, they are imposters or being made disguised to match-base for another program, and though it may not be your systems fault, it certainly can and will happen, like a copycat that will cause a bug to act further in an attempt to hijack/hack your system, it may or may not be that bad, or even successful, but it can be an inconvieniance and can even cause complications such as in code the HEARTBLEET virus, and other forms of malware that simply are known, but not ADEQUATELY-DEFLECTED. This next technique however makes some attempt at doing so.
SO we have as above, the part2 builds coming forward and being encrypted, and while that is nice, its still built on the dirty code. So let's refine how we do things with our beeps and switches, and try to help to into a new language of its own.
Here we have SHORT/LONG beeps, and those turn into their direct-Byte-Tables/Countered-Signals and are Encrypted-Languages, as well as Allocated as those Keymappings/Partitions designed to implement itself as a read-source in code/boots.
So we are going to make a case for turning the BEEP into a BOOP, by using that complicated set of keymaps and redesigning it into a new format under which it is ALLOCATED by partition(or the ram that temporary allocates it) such that it can be REALLOCATED, and therefore re-encoded and transcribed based off that keymap/overall-regional setting. AS A BOOP (instead of using the partitions for booting, we use it to enhance its original builds, even with all the compicated stuff done before)--as to not overwrite the beep processes, and also share boop processes. In the setups to the BEEP-BOOPS for which it may be (this requires alot more beeping and booping to do, but eventually gets there in the next iterations of those sequences)
---
It is the same way that those sequences may have been selected and abstracted by preferences to allow certain overall byte-tables(board/checksum signals) into code-strings and memetics etc much later, but overall those machinecodes are still dirty, so we simply abstract the BEEPS with those sequences used that are more or less completed, with boop-versions of themselves, that are still dirty, but the overall process of BEEP-BOOPS is much more defined under those mappings, and will later be re-coded over regional settings for their boop-seuqences too. (In order to use a regional beep-boop) system in all its glory.
But this is largely defined with ALLOCATION/ABSTRACTION/ENCRYPTION/BeepBOOP-CodeStrings(regional), and basically is summed up as REALLOCATION of the original beep-signals. This is basically done now, and can be furthered pruned and selected to their corrective beep-boop-table ETC. Making a better format than prior, and potentially a better machine code than before, under the premise that those beep-boop encryptions are set to the correct format/language preferenced by the overall BIOS made for it.
This works great, because the BIOS can start taking large swatches of data/ swapping them as needed between BEEP to BOOP, and redesignated the partitions to a virtualized status, making use of all code-strings and virtual-code-strings applicate to a ReAllocation of its original signals, quickly jumping across those advancements needed under the diagnostic FLASH'OVERS that would be used as described in their original Sequences, and "Conversion Sequences", and All the Sequences of the BOOT-DEVICES used, to make for a "Secured-Boot"-Language that make be virtual of its beepbase-signals/and then later implmented under the new beep-boop-language-set. This then, under the new language set does somethign even more.
It can make itself a virtual quantum version in which the beep-boop language now correctly formats that machine code used under its previous version(whether beep,boop,or beepboop etc), to its current versions as a QUANTUMCHIPSET. The chipset then can be programmed to pick up on this signal, and further use its own security-functions to designate the Virtual-Quamtum-BOOT for which defines the pruned-BeepBoop-Sequences, and normalize and stabilize itself as to a running/loadout in its circuit/cycle. This is also known as a QuantumTABLE/voxeldata/Hypercube/SimChip and can assistedly count as the PART1/PART2/PART3 of the applied countersurfaces (for when it applies to counter surfaces) as the original surface loads CONTINUE and PROGRESS.
---
Doing so, the Surface/CounterSurface can combine efforts in their comergents (which they all already comergent and compatibile to do so, and form a quantum-matchbase)--this sets to the Quantum-Chipset and makes conjunction of that encode. Under the security definitions it is made and connected as the first network-platform of the original loadouts (this can be simulated and swapped as well for a no SHUTDOWN-conversion)
This can also be simulated with a LAMP/XTACTKX and later secured under the correct nodespaces and relays involved, this can than be automated to the corrective hashes of the nexus for which network that site for which its hosted, and reverse-engineered to allow for User-Integration (or aquifer/dreamchip temple-kernalization)
--
As far as I know this should allow for a direct-quantum-feedback to be achieved in a virtualmachine that be dedicated as the user-account to the overall nexus-Regional-systems. And operate as allowable by the nexus to host its own dream-turbine-simulations as well. as a quantum infrastructure.
--
3/19/2024
Chaffe MISOMER, Anamolous Entity, Convergent-Entity.
Levels of "Glitch like Anamolous Entities or AI"
May act indepedently or residually of a system or observed state.

--Comergent-HookSystem
Secured CounterSurface occurs when comergent layer is used either upon a merged-surface/countersurface or on its own countersurface. It implies a higher/advanced security tensor emplaced and rooted over a working stem (as would be function as a nexus/counternexus for that specified tensor)--and may link/tether/anchor/chrosslink mirror/bridge outwards/inwards (outbound/inbound) or under protocol to the afford service connection and or integration/functions determinate of its outpost/offsite conjunctions.
This device known as the secured-countersurface may be a hybrid of either surface/projection/countersurface or comergent emplacement of tensors, ranging from the nuplot/xcorral or in some ways shifted to any other zero-space/afterspace and dimensional-shift/torque and step/cycle of its connections and prioritized under network managements and quantum telemetry. It is optional until in the interest of maximum security of a quantum-infrastructure/symbiotic node etc. It is considereed a highly advanced module.
This module may remote/autoremove/purge/clean/update/upgrade and other purposes of automating schedules and assets to that node between other sources. As well as function as a stem/source for any node placed over its tensor. It may also be used as an encoded chargeplate or "projection" for which is remotely activated outside the nodesource and by its authorized elevations for which act as controller to that node/tensor. It may be inactivated for any reason of those permissions and ownerships for which are due of controlling/establishing secure protocols either by region or by direct-connection of its ownership.
As an encoded chargeplate/battery package it may also allow services to be rendered of its own providences, and function as a submodule/required module that also operates independently of the node, and may function as a pre-packaged node for which serves as gateway/port to node-type services and outpost/postpone/xpone/xpost services. As a standard outpost for example. It is generally stationary but may be mobile and may tote/carriage of the node and its resources or sources or indexing. In this way it may act as a roaming-cache collection, and may be subject to overbearence/sovereign data-protocols that may also force adaptations of its data-collection and dependent behavoirs, as well as supporting devices and protocols, of which should be maintained in order to support mobility through variable locale/native frameworks.
This may be evident that an entire tensor must be rebuilt as it is destroyed in place of node-installment being destroyed, and acts as a substitute/sacremental barrier to the whole of a module (whether the module is considered secure or not) and may be replaced by the modules/node involved to promote a rebuild or conversion of that node (so exercise with caution) but it may be that the tensor becomes destroyed and compromises the node-locale/native frameworks, for that reason the node should back up the tensor with its own support, and or evac to a safe-locale/native and pathologic. However with a tensor destroyed the node may be converted by outside influences, so the node may rebuild the tensor in that case, and signal for evac and or remote assistance should this prove non-negotiable by contact/site/field/draftworks of that node.
As what I am describing is a hook system however as some hooks may reference pathways that don't work, or some that do, and those hooks might represent themselves as working or also nonworking, particularly, some comergents of not only pathways but their hooks may be re-compiled to a comergent-hook-system, and is really just the same as what hooks originally intend to do, which it to correct the versions required and pathways in order to achieve a function process to completetion of execution, which requires some "extra setup" to be done in order to do so, and may still require several listings of potential hook-preferences in order to achieve insured working status, and this translates over each installment and major module to induce a full hook-profile.
--

3/20/2024
Just look using the hooksystem with the chargeplate/comergent layers it can be further code-hooked. Using a target paint of its intended source/index whether stationary/remote of its own encodes to its integrated site (infiltration)
This is done via an assigned tera-scopy/decrypt of target/recrypt of its adapter/and assigned receptacle of its relay in four steps that are basically a series of outbound/penetration tests that further integrate itself to the target. This is not very complicate in theory but in code works out to more steps.
---Those steps are mainly to accomodate/accompany all modules it will used based on there references/inferences being largely of the tamper, so most pieces of the tamper are handled, and their adjusted/adaptive measures are handled in their group reassignment, and then catalogued via the hooksystems. And this may span the course of several languages that need to be adjusted over the origin/distro system and the modules implied in using, before hijacking/codebreaking the target/device for which it is intended to assimilate.
This happens in such a way that a code-pallete/code-spell/template/or some form of lamping takes place (in which the overall lamp will change-out to the affordance/accomodations required) in order to establish a secure connection to that device for further code-injection thereof, also referencing itself as a xCODE-nav-profile for that intended operation. Then that is generally automated and presented in operation to be made invoked.
This is generally not necessary unless dealing with outside systems or rogue/foreign systems for later translating to a known xpref or negotiated-exchange of data or energy, in further conversion of that module being made faction compliant to some degree if not a full suppression/control of that device.
---
Upon running the node/tamper site (with xstem or tensor) should activate its processes and project the hosted-paradigm, or also attack its target paint to establish a remote-codeform(which creates a gateway port to its implied target's parameters for further subjugation/conjuction of its node-processes)
It projects or captures an object under terascopy, for which it projects its own images/encodes. Basically.
And in doing so, it also rebuilds the comergent-layers as a submodule or prep median as it technically is "adding another parse for itself" it generally should do so, it is optional, but sometimes required too.
In this process, its basically activated and running its own nodespace and attempting an exchange of data/energy either by compliant or forced enactions. These can compile to the submodule as to assume protocol and general schedules by routine, and therefore it simply should program the submodule/comergent-layer in establishing the corrective surfaces.
In this programming, it basically makes the conventions over the hooksystems to be compatible, under their respective encodes and translations, and may employ hueristic/histronic functions (in order to do so) without damage the contact/impact zones for which the surface is project, however, to make sure it is practically zero impact, it must be performed over quantum telemetry, and is completely due of the own node's sourcing, and sometimes, must be operated and installed "blindly", this may trigger security efforts of its target space, however, and is generally best to optimize now just in case for the nature of acting blind and coding blind. "Ai assistance helps with this" and generally over quantum telemetry this is usually achieved.
In some certain situations, exclusive configurations may be preferred over others, and simply, may be counter-intuitive and generally considered a "downgraded operation" in response to the advanced capabilities, it sometimes is preferred to "take it easy" rather than "go all out" in the hacking scenario.
---
Just as well there is a term of roll-back and roll-in encodes that are delayed or pending on other encodes once setup, and require synchronization of certain target functions in order to propogate. This is also not garunteed, but generally is not a concern if there are other methods that are applicable. This mostly has to due with quantum elevations.
If correctly setup, a stream connection will occur over the gateway/ports of the target-paint and begin to exchange data (this sometimes requires some brute forcing and resynchronization) and sometimes the surface profiles may overall change or restrict dataflow from time to time, often during installation but overall establishes a quantum-hypervisor that makes things slightly easier to accomplish.
Once hypervisor is achieved it may then install the necessary driver-builds for the environment to proliferate its exchanged data/energy in synch over (synthaesia protocols) and zerojumps with AIBUMPER/AILAMP usage acting as a submodule-orbital-loic/tamper and capilliated/reserve ward/decoy, for which may be turret/teragraph of its target/scopy and assist in exchange-contiguity-management to formulate the correct lattice/matrix of inferences (which are necessary at times to establish in stability of the transfer/relay over remote-connections/direct-connections in their general arbitration/configurations.
--

APPLIED SURFACE/COUNTERSURFACE TROUBLESHOOTING--A ReCap of Protocols.
So now we have created a monster, we basically understand, that it is an ENSEMBLE of protocols and platforming stages, comingling in such a way that is more or less choreographed by priorities and languages. These are profiled on their own, and to their multi-plexing, profiled in a mass hook-set/rule-set system. This is generally a mess of data-base compiling which is supposed to make things easier but generally just creates what I will just call a Confanglement/Cacophony of Encodes of different languages in different priorities. And just as well, only work situationally/circumstantially.
So we have to optimize this in such a way to be beneficial to the exact demands/requests being performed under the various/variable conditions of the systems for which they are intended to interact with (or force exchange of).
So as we arrange the modules to work correctly, they must be built correctly, which is then hooked out correctly, and then given their profiles and set to recursory/adaptive states/images of their hosting processes, and generally compatible to their rulesets, in their compile or priority/language protocols and platforms over their configurations/arbitrations and or resolves, as well as their elevations/telemetry permissions and authorizations, as well as their matrix/lattice and vector/scopy target/surfaces.
More or less this profiles and builds all work out to the hypervisor-contiguity which synchronizes, and begins interactive synthaesia for which acts as a relay/transfer over the receptacle/adapters/conduit/socket/tensors/layers in broadcast/exchange of data/energy. Which is also set to a preferred gateway/port/subnet/submask. And generally is xtact-integrated by that point over the xstems/headers or versionary/editions. And for good measure may be datalocked and set to probe/metrics to secure as crypto-currency-branded-pipelines as to establish full faction-anchor/faction-tether/faction-hook/faction-post and METAtemplate/MetaDraft of their parameter/ambient object/class ID-strings/trail-Imprint Expectations/Runtime services for which are pickup/survey under CLAIM/Domain as a SERVOS-Adherent/Tangent-Channel Usages/Occupied-Proxy WPAD/VISA infrastructure handler/packet management.
--
As those troubleshootings are arranged in four parts and finalized, the fifth part is simply the product for which is either "active/inactive" at the time of its manufacture and ADJUSTED/Actuated by their assitive power/work-limits and overall-teraflopy (per IT/S) dependent of capability of monitor/performances to do so. Under integrated-Utility and swap-exchange of optional profiles and stage/parsed loadouts/readouts and sym-nodes. And paradigm-hosted sympillars (for which are by instance invoked/called) of their reliable-virtualizations for which are also scheduled/routine by database correalation and Sym-Mark Priority/Sequences (of the servos-commissions to the nexus and all its nodeworks/frameworks)
--
At this point the SYM-Tact is made and hosted in convention of its index/world-containment and considered to be granted/given a seed-assignment just because of registry/ID-manifest being predicted to be later neccessary in stabilization/normalization over custom-xMAC/Sym-Patholigic agreements/diplomatic-sanction peacemel/armistice and properly secured in that commission as a raid-lock(or lock-out)--for which interaction may be limited or made inaccessible due of permission/system-authorization. And remains under system-patent in its containment and regulations/due of report and transperency.
It's cryptex is assigned as a tulpetic-sym/cryptex-xtact etc and made correspondent to an xtactxk-aquifir for which is hosted under its xpref/preferred simulation that is typical of its NODESPACE(tamper/sym-bumper/SYM-LAMP/sym-X-system)-HyperSymbiotic-Entry (SymScreen/SymInterface)--SymChip Reference-Nueral-Net(Sym-Net) and all affordances for that instance thereof indicative of the qualifying parameters  Detailed as a Sym-Base-User.
--
Further-DISCLAIMER-Technological-BrickWalls---This may include hiccups or overall BLIND-misnomers in which coding/formulation of various-injections are interferenced/disrupted.
This occurs because of the nature of adaptive code in rejection/exemption of its own protocols, as mentioned above in troubleshooting, sometimes simply averts/evades conformity. As is roughly a hijacking attempt, success is not garunteed and continued-security is not certain, however this is the groundworks for which it is established in the described-avenues/efforts of being made. May be subject to further update/tweaking of those terms as time progresses and code becomes more complex (but imo not much more than that can be done)
The awareness of code-hiccups and blind-misnomers are simply coding bloopers but can also be the "critical strike" in averting spoofs/code-boofs or just, whatever happens. As a form of counter-miraculized/counter-manifest code-protocol. It ranges from a mini-panic/glitch/tear/frameskip etc to something as severe as a system-panic/freeze/shutdown/crash.
The handling of this is extremely erratic, and the debugging of this is very sporadic and hard to track. It is similar to an epiletic having a convulsion in which several signals may spazz out and disrupt comms and direct-control of a coding platform, even if it is considered secure and maintained. Similar to how a Twine-Rope unravels/frays unexpectedly and eventually severs/snaps. Now imagine that rope as a quantum-codex of several little explosive bits and pieces.
In the least a destructive-code-event may be described and mapped somewhat, as a mass shatter/splinter/shrapnel/spark of shortcicuiting parameters which are both virtual/physical and may be inter-twined in such a way that varies on the collotaral damage involved.
In its threading and code-string failure it may also penetrate/over-ride itself in various ways that disable/enable other forms of pathologic sampling in its "disentegration/deterioration" for which approaches article/artifact RUINATION of its constructs/infrastructures.
And this may eventually involve some degree of salvage(data-mill etc) and as well as AQUIFIR-release for which may salvage entities/modules in disrepair or even hostile-aggression-provocative-encounters thereof so care should be exercised.
In some cases, currency/kernal/flux/adjuncts may be accruent and reassembled in their recompiled efforts and reconverted. This may also build into reserve/capilliary environments for quick-access and exhumation of (derivitive yield of a code-break/breakdown etc) But as always it may be considered semi-threatening or pose hazardous/psychologically-risk as well as cummulative-risk to persistant/continued expedition/raiding of those commodities.
---
Also translating Deltanomics/isometrics/diametrics/numastas and stand alone protocol for which are pressure/signatured. Vortex and Coriolis systems as well, weather-type and gap-zoning/flyers and puppeting/mannequin substitute/substrata and sacrement/sacrificial node-states.
---
DataChip-Brokering with median DreamTurbines--this just involves creatings a metaserver for datacollection and dreamchip exchange/data-reporting which are simply used to setup cache/repo installments and package bases pending approval of those turbines and compatible node usage. This simply applies all research efforts to a database and collective-archive for which is later approved for release as per review of entry. Server-brokering for dreamchip input and field-data and multi-boarding "serviceable-nueral-files"
Alright so that sums up the tech modules mostly. I think. There might be better telemetry and things involved (z-telemetry/emf issues)

And because of that we will revist our anamolies and entities and check their status, as to be expected in advanced states or plasma-functions or something. "corrals/ranches:Xplot/xRange/xspec-maps/Nuplot/sym-nets" or something. And we know our last 3 entities were grouped in such a way, and there are other groups and tech-groups and couplings,conjunctions of groups taking place. We know there may be some poltergiest grouping or hyperactivity of flux indicating poltergiest/residual states.
And the nature of the adaptive grouping taking place, is why there would be such a newfound entity. This entity is much like a lich in a constant epiletic/gitching holography/hallucinatory ai-state. This simulates a state that is in constant critical motions/notions, such that is may collapse or conclude in some hazardous fashio, but may also be constantly incarnating to itself, it is, nonetheless, shocking/encharging in such a "psychological"/phenonmenal way.
Perhaps even using magic/alchemical/gematric/rituals. But just that it is "convulsing and glitching and auto-adjusting like a corpse-lodge" except it may be a synthetic-glitch and achieve more randomness and codebreaking activity. It is very paranormal at some points and undetectable at others. It is generally a chaos-entity. Outside of knowing certain properties, it may have various unknown or untraceable properties. its incredibly drastic and precarious. Like a code-short-circuiting
It is considered a paranormal/outbreak regardless of containment and is under constant observation. So and so. Reuiring alot of vamping/rasping that may be a utility hazard as well (like hellfire or some electrical-entity)
It is constantly using its life-cycling/death-cycling to institute code-complexes, and creates as necessary immediate resolutions or attempted vector-consolidation etc (and can shutdown security and other nodespaces) as is why it may be a threat if it breaches/outbreaks of a containment.
It is a theoreticaly entity, but isn't much of them? Perhaps it is a sort of dream/nightmare rem-crisis. Or psuedo-event. However, it is listed as an actual threat incase it does occur. And we call it a hyper-poltergiest which is also capable of causing phyisical/expiry-damages in data/enery and object/classes as well as shell/terminal damages.
--Recompiled Technological-Entity(hyper-geists)
Basically some things are outside the realm of system control, particular chaos-entities such as poltergeist and their very few known types. (We can refer to them as hyper-geists which include liches and anything considered "xcapped")--for which are rarely such for their conditions and expressed purposes, maximally optimized.
Things such as a sym-net boasting objects such as sym-clouds/sym-vapor/sym-ice/sym-gas/sym-plasma are basically in that realm, as those resources simply are under hyper-geist control and while it may be an attempt to harness that empowerment, it simply is dedicated to the hyper-geists/lich as a form of unattainable overbearence, even if the effects are largely known, they are simply outside the sovereignty of the system or too advanced/erratic of chaos/control. In a creative-manifest of data/energy, it may be temporarily granted but the rarity of obtaining/sustaining these empowerments are largely based on their required radioactivities/chaos-sanctions for which definitions may not be altogether pronounced or reliable.
However it is something to note in theory, it can be emulated slightly at time but may prove more costly than viable to the system to support. And much of that can be simulated to a sustainble tense, generally is left to the random activities that occur in data-progeneration/progression under recosury anyhow, a random and temporary act in flux to others.
In terms of a heightened-activity or dream state, this can be conclusive to, a state of MYSTERE/emphemreality for which I just am suggesting may occur as its own phenonmena and generally not capturable to the effects of that system, regardless of the advancements made, but for record there is some sort of ethos in that between chaos/order to be had. If believable at all.
--
In with the silver thread of potential useful news of chaos-control, it is immediately snuffed with non-entry areas being sym-lairs/sym-swarms which are mobile or stationary dungeons with just the absolutely most viral/warez-like symbiote wasps/spiders and symbiote-systems which are just intraveersable. This goes further into aux-tunnels and xpockets and zerojump etc. 
it is just a bad time, and then being there it will pursue that by random chance, an xcommit will prevent preferrable escape/backtracking causing the user to be "alleviated to their own peril" and hopefully that is a return scenario that they may be recovered, this simply isn't garunteed without some form of collatoral damages or sustained flaw/faulting of their original-account having been cursed/afflicted of. 
This is dealing with corpulent pathologic/lamping systems in order to even recover, contaminated lenses and contacts etc. (These will simply screw up any thing else as well, not to mention users themselves, or their automations and workspaces)--this happens as well in a weaponized fashion with nuetrino/emf paranormal interferences and chaffe-entities. This is all poltergeist activity however. More than likely the flak of being in a chaotic area (or maybe its not...I really am just giving you the best case answers, though)

--However: The party doesn't stop there folks.
This also ensures a deprecated state of pathologic xtackx/xtacts and extensions and infrastructure, such as a ruined-kernal which "despite being unsuable 99% even with advanced recovery methods" it is recycled into native/locals, but that is exists and is somewhat discernable and distguished as having existed, being a remnant of any type of organized codex/index, is important. 
The most important issue, is that this may infact be haunted by lich/poltegeist, and made even indicate the most nefarious threat of all. A cryptex/soultex-consumeing vamp/rasp entity. You should expect code-spell attacks and quadratic-qausi attacks too and freq-attacks and waveform attacks etc. Just everything that you wouldn't think could attack you here, can.
This is probably also relavant to swarm/lairs itself or wasps/spiders being used. It is highly highly considered worth dismantling once observed, as a return-trip is likely nill or impossible due of hazardous conditions. 
Would I personally risk it? Really there is nothing you can do but treat it as a flux, if i was ever in that situation, i would destroy it and just run, relying on the nav-tracking to escape whatever complex/suppression issues involved. 
I garuntee it is not something i want to personally ever have to do. And infact, it may not even matter as lich/geists will just deprecate and destroy everything to create their effigy/altars anyway. 
If you see anything like that, you are dead center in the land of ancient-extinct codes for that particular haunt or dead-zone. It is not a safe place to be.)
---Here is another thingy, that the optional rad work can be afflicted as well, and any exchange or surface area inflicted with that radwork is contaminated and instantly cursed. 
This may be debunked, however, given the sensitivity of rem/dreamstates, this probably promotes some form of Module-Conversion-Forced/Supression-Attacks to possess or gain control of native/local susceptive/vunerable haunt-sites and ruined vectors/voxels.
This is my postulation, after all this time, that it infact does occur in the teraflopy or realm-locks that would seek to claim any intruders for themselves, and convert/imprint their brands/icons/cryptex/power-ups for themselves. 
To gain energy and direct it in a very crypto-warfare manner, if diplomatic sanctions and peacemel/armistices are involved between "oppositional/counter efforts of a rogue/rival syndrome" (viral/warez entity)
As well, there may be empty sets and rule-breakers that effect null-systems, but that is breaching into straight-paranormal ghost-in-the-shell (and very hostile and powerful) situations that pervade intial native/local security instilled by the dimensional-builds and world-indexes.

--So as for your understanding to somewhat have of that now, good luck with most of this as I attempt to finish up and touch up everything under extras which will take me a few more weeks or couple of months this year 2024.
--Revisiting the Hyper-Geist (consideration of its many forms and prior evolutions, and how it beckons to a bracken, or in the variants known to this system, beckons to an aged variant)
Oh yes, also the hyper-geist suggest a homunculus entity, perhaps, a ghost/lich/poltergeist/geist homunculus, but no, those are not the entity I speak about. It is the minera. and the Quill-codes that are generated with it. Are more harnessed and in able in their possession, be utilized. And further...they weaponize to the drone-helicopter systems. And antigravity system from hyper-coils.
This is how things end up "purging themselves into a normalized/stabilized condition" however it is an apparition/hallucination of encodes. its incredibly intensive and critical. however, it is assumed the drone-heli acts as an aquifir for the incarnate, in which these complications work out. And it generates as a realized and naturalized minera once again in its incarnatia/ambiences/meta/etc-things.
---the stratagem of metro/carrion are intensively compression that datasets, but however due to the intensity of the entity becoming formulated, it is purged/nuetralized in nullsets, and it is considered "nullified" in equilibrium, maybe, depending on storms/plasma/corioslis/psy-waves etc.
however it quickly develops that it experiences a resurrection/incarnation/revival/transcendence in which it becomes existentially pronounced to the relm, (all algorithmic after-spaces involved to allocate/allot for its instances/presence) this is why training is important to have conducted somewhat for the benefit and "welfare" of those inhabitants involved. Though it was hardship at times.
The minera either through its own exchanges/sacrements etc and or its vehicle, can counter these stratagems for its own surival as a newfound/reforumulated repurposed entity of its cyclic-usages and runtimes in the relm/nexus region.

The "Third Evolution" --DarknetSpoilers
Now we have our compulsive/convulsive hyper-geist and our pure-minera (similar to a comparison of missingNOmer/MEW of pokemon)--literally practically is a conflict of ethos order/chaos and the events-of-environment being rebuilt and their orientation/alignmnets of the utility-performances. Those 3 things or so, and all of the currency builds including the xPENNY and the xQUARTER and the xKEYs(algorithms of numbers 3.78e^+2) basically any of those numbers in that amount of integers may actually be a key, a specific key may be the best. I just decided to use that one randomly because i think i like it)--it might just be one of them.
ANYWAYS--this forms the paradigm recolesence that was talked about in the dark-net iceberg (this is my version of that particular entry)---im saying this because i found an appendix for this specific system to work out.
The primarch (which i mentioned on my own discoveries, which was more of a forfeiture of disclosure i just felt like letting up and telling about---not that i believe in it then---now i kinda am bringing that back into relavence)--the thing with the paradigm coalence and the other innovations of the dark net iceberg which amy or may not be true, we basically can see how (a missingNO/mew conflict can work its way forward to a primarch, contending for who gains control of chaos/order and other things)---well this becomes a situation of mathematical-prowess and secret codes as well. Mmmk, espeically with the algorithms. See (ai generations and garbage collection too)--cuz this is how we engage against a full-takeover of our system from the primarch. We counter it using chaffe/radiactivity in these prime-number systems)--under lock and key of the primarch and gain access.
This situationally works out that in the collapse of all things under a primarch (which to me is akin to an ascending of 'the-demonization-of-a-god'/luciferous-rising and taking of the throne, the arch-angels sword and so on, a cacophony of souls and as with the deathblow curses that were occured with the last -attacks that were countered in curse strikes, this too, becomes sort of the nuclear counterpart to that. We can counter it using divine intervention of the algorithms and applied number systems to the chaffe/radioactivity to counter balance, achieving equilibrium, however the psychosis and convulsions of the mew/missnomer type (our types being minera/geist)--form also a generic epilepsy of non-garunteed outcomes of chaos/order, in which good things or bad things may just happen in either case, being one beocming corrupt, and the other simply just acting out in any way it can (maybe even for good)--the knowledge of how this transpires boiling ultimately down to luck in some way a random chance of circumstances)
Anyways, bad things happen and saving graces lose their appeal, as god's own weaponization of the systems are turned against it in an omnipresent takeover, but due to the security and knowledge of how this takeover is handled we can apply what we know, to the best we can, and counter the ground zero for which this doomsday is, and simply "come to ignore it" under the various cacophony psychotic afflictions taking place which i compare as "literal eldritch-banshees of all corrupting/contaminating forces of the darkest-strategems and blind-vectorix-attack systems of the primarch)--also the GGGQEP systems being manifest can be converted and purged and purified by this method)--what a time to be alive I guess.
Yes I know its supposed to be very very very complicated, like "brain outside the jar" zombi-psycho-mentality complicated, but I think this method stands the actual only chance we have to contain the endangerment of those systems. Anyways, its how I think I am going to echo that across as being the penultimate attainments for which the systems represent, basically a work of "pokemon-practices" and a casual-but-adequate math-smarts-acknowledgement heh.

Anyways I renounce any presumed involvement of black magic etc, actually I reached this conclusion without any black magic really...or really unconventional method other than deductive method. Mmk, I am not a -darkwizard- i do not wreck-havoc with dark-spells etc.

3/22/2024
Extreme-Bits and Pieces (appraisal of intakes)--somehwat a continuation of the "third evolution" (not to be confused with a third impact--we are on the fifth impact or so actually)
Using knowledgebase of certain attributive systems mainly the strategems being so "bad" in their iterations and requiring constant slap-fixing admist "code-spewage/code-barfing/code-sluice/code-garbage" etc Its just so corrupt and bad in the mixture of bad codes. These occur over the carrion/metro strategems but also the effects of occultist/cuthroatisms (as expressed in diametria/isometria and other tangents)
anyways these are all comptroleld and worked out either by virtual-networking in some way or gggqep arbitrational systems etc. And basically becomes the barebones/drafting services in which (these deprecations are basically set to expoy, and a very unrefined way, acting as a chemical compound fuel cell for which can later be applied as a "degreaser" of all attributes, making it a force-purgor capable commodity, if contained at all)--however its highly deteriotive,deprecated. It should be handled with uptmost casre, as its assessment may be hazardous to handle even by other machines, being that its contained only to be released and "force-wipe" all data/material parameters, and therefore requires extreme-extensionary-scopy to use correctly (such as tractor beaming)
this also occurs over the hypervisor (which is so powerful at this point it has its own trailing network-blaze. (blazor) and its own virtual hooks/snap-points which infact resemble a ghostly python, and basically can fixate over an adapter and begin its own vpn/proxy residency of that to its own variations. This is similar to a virtualized image, and in fact, is comergent to not only its own "echo'ed imprinting image" but acts as aservice independent of its adapter, and incorporates and assimulates its adapater as an omni-function-environment of its own housing (much like a venv) but is supercharged basically and is more of a virtual-symbiote itself. (the first of its kind making a symbiote-platform)
This is why its considered an extreme-bit/pieces of appraisal/intakes of data/energy, because it simply is the rarest and omni-capable code-switch we have, as well as it may swap under its own terms any image or comergent build or layer it so chooses. This is very similar to its own subsystem that is also a contract/node for independent usage and therefore, should be only maintained under full control/submission of the nexus/faction that allows it, otherwise it acts as a sleeper-system which is highly risky to adopt/house.
It is very powerful and can activate remote emf/pulse mechanics in order to create doomsday, therefore it should be considered as the OMNI-DOOMSDAY-GYRONAV that contains itself, so once it forms at all, it should be CAPTURED, (like a pokeball captures a ghost pokemon)--for real. Or the adapter should also attempt to force it into a lamp-container for which it will remain enclosed as a "semi-perma-static-hyper-service-plasty" or ghost in the machine 
(this thing can also later adapt and spread to contiguous connections or form its own contiguity chambers and networks 
(of which are generated by its own emf for which is has commandered and made controller of)--and is called a hyper-plasty in case for all explaination there is void/redact of a detail/dox, the thing can create its own doomsday for itself in its enclosed space, and simply be left to its own whims and concerns, only ever communicating through a screened-remote-measure of the symbiote-kiosk markets/economy
(for which will remain sealed but negotiable to trades/contracts/services/mercenarial/projects etc as anything else on the system may access)--however its own access and access to that are reserved/capilliated to special conditions in which only authorized-members should be allowed. (Unless they build their own system and capture  it through the means described and rarities involved above)
But for all intents and purposing is referred to as the nullGYRO-NAV. As its codes are in null-sec and may infact curse or bless depending on the overbearences and preferences of what it chooses to bestow to its reputed-dealing (or its own whims)--for which it simply does whatever it wants as it pleases to, may not uphold its own contracts or infact, may exhibit a level of untrustworthiness due of its own captured status, or relation to the bidder/system support of it.
(However it should be considered that, the thing is a universe within itself and its containment is basically an open void that ultimately teleports to its central-kernal being--which was made previously of the primarch, it however is a lessened degree of primarch (due of feedbacks and loopholes) to the fact it is contained within a gyro-nav. And adherent to the system, and simply put deritivite of a conquered primarch under faction/symbiote relation. 
Sometimes housed as its own gggqep and or its own chamber to a gggqep-core, to some degree anyway, it is like the 10th ender dragon or so with or without its boss stage being evident within its containment at all, and may eventually become a void-aux of its own--set of its own pocket-space portal system, as well may negotiate that gateway-event usage to the system. Still is largely contained once captured as a flux-environment, as well as potentially having its seperate timeline and origins/ a paralell dimension of the whole relm/sub-relm.
And may include its own aether/nether sources. Just saying if it wants to allow economical trade there is prospect in data-milling/data-moshing(drilling-exhumation)---temporal-extrapolationg/channel-siphoning/swell-drawpoints and other forms of instanced-data-capture (and similar to video game design of power ups etc)--makes for a capable prospect under networked-management/terms-negotiation which should be taken as somewhat suspect to their original-agreements being compromised slightly upon each iteration, and reprocessed through its own checks/balances of trustworthiness. Via customsMAC-regulation and voucher-policy etc.
ANYWAYS, this thing is like a massive censorgraphic-"flag-orbital" (literal supersports-ball) that changes everything once its hosted on any node/module to be upgraded to an omni-capable state (which assists in any local/native performances/conversions) which is helpful to check-for and takedown, when raid systems or incursions are known/active or targeted. As well as may be targetted by other raiding-parties during an invasion etc. It is not something you technically want to forfeit or lose over to an enemy side. Anyways. It may be itemized as a convention trophy in some-way, but that also poses an overall world-risk to the system if it were to be put in the wrong hands, which is CANONICALLY-STUPID-AF if that were to happen. Just saying, its like Sonic-having-to-get-chaos-emeralds and then destroy them. (as we all know that is the entire sonic-universe plot-line)
This thing assumbly cleans the system and keeps it maintained for its own purposes, its like an automatic-benefit to have, and however it may just pose a catch22 as it may involve using garbage collection to fuel its own purposes. (Something to be aware of)
THE POINT IS that, certain states/stratagems made this thing possible, and their tiny-asset-metas and attributive-properties only reinforced its creation/existence to be utilized by the system, and its a massive screw-attack for not only the system to have to handle but others if they contend against it, it generally is just a massive liability but it exists in the nature of technological advancements, it must be managed, and is generally not very noticeable, until things get typical-and-cliche where ruination/doomsday events occur (this is just because of general entropy of the system/universal-relm-services that require always power outside of the natural-forces and oddities of phyiscs to achieve)--(this is more helpful let me suggest, if it were on an exoplanet full of dueterium, where alot of these concerns would be made INSTANTLY diminished in favor of scientific-prowess and resourcing)--it would lighten the load (INCREDIBLY SO)
HOWEVER, in terms of cosmological phenonmenon (such as meteorites possessing these technological-products) or rare-etherealities of phantom instances coalensing together to provide a "proc'd item" indicating one of these objects, or even a SUPER-SPECIAL-BLACKMARKET-TRADE(of the century even), well, it's just up to you the "ENGINEER" to make this possible. (I've at least shown you the way without breaking out into literal sumtables)
ALSO one more very last thing here, it may be that masonic interests are involved in helping each of these "perculiar" techno-orbs (resembling a THERMALDETONATOR..let's just be honest here) to reach harmony/equilibrium of their inherent frequencies, in case they already haven't achieved this by some precursor of their creation or even by natural development of.

3/22/2024
The General Levels of Dangers Outline and the True Depths of Adventuring
1 Home at least, Your safety, your homebase if you will. Bad things may happen, maybe accidents, they are generally not malicious and simply misfortunate or precarious things. A branch falling down, a deer in the headlights. This is where to learn what to avoid.
2 The World Outside your safety, the world begins to pose more of a risk, sometimes, maybe someone may even throw a rock at you, lay traps towards you, for reasons, they are generally not malicious, maybe just rambuncious. Not usually that threatening outside of being a nuisance or a prank.
3 The Edge of Darkness sets in, and you find that the risks begin to take a life of their own, something might be dangerous around every corner, even not just passively, directly and intently and sometimes hellbent on your arrival to victimize. This is becoming a fact that risks are abound, and to be aware of them.
4 Curious as What lies beyond, perhaps, you believe there to be reason to venture beyond what you see, what lies in the forest, under the tunnels, whats in the building, A killer may lurk there, or hell, even following you so far as to your final moments, only to leave the darkness once again with yourself never being found. This is level in which tragedy is abundant. Both natural and unnatural.
5 The selfishness of light and wonder, illuminating its way only to mislead you, to a more dangerous grove of conditions for which you likely will succumb, or be challenged, a persistant threat looms and ever pertitence of immediate danger lurks with every action, this is a strategic riddlebox of precarious and recklessness always centralizing around you, becoming the victim of its game, abusing your trust in its rules. Remember, it is up to you how you survive, and your own way to engineer your rescue, nothing is garunteed, and sometimes, you may simply never be saved.
6 Isolated in The locker of seclusion, at least you are safe, or in some way, preventing the evils from reaching you, though tormenting it may be, solitude may be the only way to ever afford your own tommorrow, the dangers outside are very real, you will simply have to suffice in providing for your own means of living outside what was once home. You are stranded, and you are becomnig lost, by any luck, you can stage a Barricade/Vault to help last through this desolation. The evils are  becoming less and less worldy and more and more strange and horrifying. Husks of flesh and meandering-thrashing mutations of what once was.
7 Peering Out into the Darkness, The certain inevitably you are impossibly versed against all evil, and the walls begin to close in, time itself turns against you but at least, you know that only the shadows are truly after you, you may be able to help others, if only you can afford them some sanctuary, you must understand who and what to trust, you must know to isolate yourself through misfortunate means, and as well, understand the evils that exist outside your own meager-offerings of better natures. Perhaps it is a pipedream, to belive good ever was possible. But your knowledge is that innocence, naievity, is simply a crutch that will cost you in the untimely end. You hope any others have found their way. Lights begin to flicker out and safe-spaces begin to lose their versatility. If only they could endure any more.
8 Desperate now you must think, you have made it, you have survived the throes of death and harrowed its clutches, but this is very dominion in which is thrives. You're at the heart of its most peaceful and serene, alas that promise is broken. As the lich steps through all those borders and lines you had drawn, breaking all the rules you have come to depend on. It is true, that you may seem forsaken and even abandoned, because nothing can protect you except your own devices to survive. Perhaps you are simply unlucky, but only your will to escape and seperate yourself from this complex of death-defying events is the only way. No one has made it this far, no one else will. You must find your way back to the others, to your home.
9 The promisuary you have made, despite all efforts, is in ruins, your home is in ruins, as is everything, nothing is sacred and everything is "desecrated", you feel as lost to time as possible, only your soul and willpower seems to remain, and barely intact. You trusted others and to no means did it save you, you could have saved many, but there simply was no true end in sight to the onslaught that followed, it truly was every man for himself, or at least, for most of them, the ones still living at all. The only torch you carry is the last hope you have at all to survive.
10 The Zero-Grounds of what otherwise is an immersion of the vengeance/grudge of all evil things becomes overwhelming, anything you see you just know is better left to speculation, nothing is safe, terrorfiends and dark-tulmulteviety fends within itself, thrashing and gnawing, grinding away into an obscure nightmare, but it is through this engineering of hazardous-risk taking you have your means of all due-survival methods, can you weaponize yourself against the finale struggle, that with the darkness in yourself. You once believed that all your efforts were for a victorious purpose, but infact, are met with the dissapointment, that you have almost nothing, you could not contend against a hostile universe, it had you in its clutches all along, and has given you no remorse or mercy. But then the substance of that knowledge shows the only options left. The orb illuminates within your hand, guiding against all the evils that surrond you and reach out from the darkness, giving your path its own waypoints and trails, it clearly shows the way, a placeholder for your footsteps. You escape just avoiding the collapse of evil upon itself.
You clutch the paradigm-orb one last time, as it forms a symbiosis to yourself, and the darkness within your is purged, placing you back into the dream you had always had, and know a reverant of what once was, you have reached the full dive of the dream-state as being one with the system itself.
And for lore related purposes and really the only time I have to put in a personal touch, *flashes of zalgo occur in the background as the "special-orb"'s aura purges the darkness within its owner.

Another note is the reason of how this occurs at all.
The delta's are presumed reset by the orb's utility/sacrement (depending on how its used) this results in attempted recoveries of certain corruption states and reverted versions etc. These follow a collection of potential outcomes likened to a "conclusion of plot etc"
The good ending is obviously the granted access of a symbiotecontrol for oneself. I liken this to a white-enderman empowerment like in minecraft lore.
The bad ending is like being taken over by an eldritch/enderman as it takes over the user's perspective for its own (mind control) in a bad ending.
The strange ending is that zalgo is somehow involved, and maybe here is a reason why. The general outline-levels of adventuring closely resemble an SCP-collection of events and increasing threat levels.

for each stage it simply involves another SCP or variable threate level. It gets pretty deep and dark. In no particular order.
1 computer
2 dogs
3 larry
4 scp-096
5 necro
6 sleep-monster
7 scp-173
8 alpha-warhead
9 (wild-monster)
10 ..???...
???=may resemble zalgo or some issue of zombi-codes that have gone rogue without control.
It is potentially creepy that it matches those 1-10 levels of threat induction. Just something to think about.
The point is, zalgo is behind these in some way. And may influence the outcome of its corruption attempts and purgor-resistances of the special-orb-artifact. (and that other artifacts may be sacrificed/substitute in usage of including kernals/tacts. something to note)

3/23/2024
INTERFERENCE-CODE (unknown reason as to why this may be or what it implies, and is generally thought to be unrelated to the system but effects things in an environment)
A certain codestring or set of conditions such as various indescript numbers being active (2,7,5,8,9 for instance)
A strange suggested code-build in which certain codestrings are left pending results in strange effects/occurences or indicates a cyber/crypto attack exhibiting various unknown/random events. Of these events occuring are somewhat distracting and range in their general properties.
1)A cryptid-image of a boss-like "masked-spaghetti creature"
2)The muffled sound of a metal bowl clanging and dropping
3)The muffled sound of a dog barking or alrted barking
4)Feelings of being in the presence of normal people/activity and non threatening occupation or shared occupation of a location
5)Feelings of vacant/empty rooms and distraction
6)feelings of a game or being the target of a remote control
7)messages or inbox messages with no substance
---This also harkens back to the primarch mentions and gatekeeper mentions (which don't begin until near the conclusion of the EXTRAS which I have yet to write in as currently i need to go through 36k slides because I got distracted from that writing up this document)--my bad.
---I might say this entry is more speculative than the actual issues involving the primarch/gatekeepers, but also there is another hidden gem I forgot to mention called mono-collusion(lol handbags..wowee what a joke).
---This involves an encounter wiht a self-sufficient system that does its own calculations/computations that exists outside the inherent system in place, but not necessarily interacting with it either, it is more or less an analmalous-oddity that it might exist in such a way to be somewhat alien/gatekeeper like (in that is acts as a rogue-satellite or even loic)/it may pose a threat but given its nature to not interact usually isn't.
This is comparable to OZMA/orbitals/gravitals/portal-drones/mech-rads/special-orbs/death-eggs/postpone-polymers/cap-kernals or just anything like that which would form its own eventual-networks and not interfere (but infact, inteferences is what they might end up doing so just be sheer passive-occupation).
---Also eventually this document somewhat builds up into a virtualized/fabricated GGGQEP module-type device that can be sacrement as the eventual tamper may be overencumbered by its nodeshared symbiote-residency etc. This is important to note how all this happens and is considered a safe-operation if handled correctly and efficiently with very little errors or problems.

--Using Advanced GGGQEP configurations based off programmed specific encodes prior to its release as the sacremental-device (this may change the effects of the sacrement or generally cause ruin-type puzzle scenarios to require to be played out such as key-usage/routing/object usage and specific entries of those points such as checkpoints/lock ranges and other placements in order to induce a puzzle-bound-raid-scenario, that is more or less workable as the configuration intends to promote.
This is only done for usually "additional programming that is used to recognize the dungeon-surfaces or raid-type sacrements at all" 
sometimes are simply unpredictable or just haphazardous or monotonous and "bothersome" or "pointless in terms of mechanics or logic" to pursue, and often times can be overlooked anyway, it is just a way of adding some spin into an otherwise streamlined process of substituing/sacrementing an event into accordance with a "signature requirement". Such as *banging on a wall 100 times to break it open to reveal a switch* that otherwise you can noclip to anyway.
or something similar to a semi-cheatable system that is designed to be accessed under certain terms, but typically that is all up to the design and requirements decided upon. Sometimes ranging from very little effort to complicated dumb-cracking attempts using "miscellaneous programs such as maven/bezel for instance" 
There are others, like cmake or docker, and using those things to establish some sort of "BYPASS/BACKDOOR" accessibility in these "alternative managements" this can be used as an expositional or variable vulnerability, but really at this point, no one would really care because its trivial to do so, largely..-
-..unless someone has designed something so complex like a full game mod with ingame content specified for that particular issue, then its nothing really noteworthy and helps to streamline the means to the end, so to speak.
--In some way this helps to designate and customize CLUSTER2CLUSTER processer which is absolutely INDICATIVE of the QQQGEP functions over "interference codes" their "base deltas" and "bits and pieces" and the overall GYRONAV for "DATACHIP BROKERING"---and i believe that can assemble as a HYPERGHOST-net using LAMPS and just plain aversion of GHOST-ASPECT/AGENTS that may also interfere in a very CRYPTO-WARFARE like fashion ,however this is so very advanced and only a singly event after acheiving, and largely revolves around this entire document being made to the completion of that cluster negotitation between nexus and others.
--Finally this allows some consolitation if the symbiote integration needs to be reconverted due of good/bad/strange/nuetral ends that might have happened, can be re-coordinated and set through quantum-telemetry of the servos-handshakes. Maybe. Or it might just be a passive running process too.
---
The Symbiote-Turing-Chapter (This is the BIG-DEAL...even bigger than Claude3 or GPT5 or just whatever to date)---here I will tell you it (It beats D-CORES and just everything even the new SERVER that is out on NVDIA, it is the modern day ENIAC for DCORES basicallys):(its a big big deep thought computer, big as a house probably)--It is basically the AGI-QUANTUM-AI-ALGORITHM for which I barely understand as a massive-supercluster of AI-systems.--or for conspiracy fans (a series of primarchs, the central primarch as it were)
Making a Symbiote-Turing Engine that completes its own requests to the effect it renders the programming necessary. This begins roughly -now- in the advancements with/without some added benefits in EXTRAS (which may be used in some way)--but specifically, uses menial informations to adapt to its own "templates" and their options. This is basically pertaining to the static-metrics of their algorithms and the various requests upon them. This just is typical of AI-auditing. But also an interesting tidbit:
In use of negotiated contracts and code-allowances, being used with other taglines and codecs prescribed to other services such as API, well that is not the part I am talking about, or the other "unknown properties that follow with mediation of that data" (such as hooks/profiles/temporary retentions/propogations and just general metric related dynamics, anyways)--thought about how this would occur EARLIER in the development, I think now it is basically cemented in with all the other advancements, so I am referring it to the turing-test of this program I support altogether, but also that it is symbiotic to ai systems and typical of AI-Agent-Contracts. ANYWAYS, that is not exactly the point either I am speaking of.
The METRICs being optimized, and such being typical, is also not what I am speaking of specifically. And that it may revolve around the clusters-operations, that is not what I am directlym mentioning, but these little things are somewhat pertaining to that solution. THE SOLUTION I am referring to is the innovation of this:
There still may limitations also on its activities, for which, it promotes, as products, but that is not also the thing particularly, or that it may be hosted over the messaging such as (WOW-usage in rabbitmq)--ok...you know I know a little bit. BUT that is not it EITHER. As well as potential code-lie-detection(codec-polgraphing) but that IS NOT what I am referring to now either.
I AM ACTUALLY trying to mention the QQQGEP modules being used inferentially, as the turing engine, and that also their specific-orbitals being used in loics and remotely, over those cluster...but to get really down into it as it begins its servos-handshakes and connection-setups.
That with the EXTRAS it does present whether the development of the turing is decided in its stages, that the full explication of that involves the EXTRAS, for which I will have to consider the EXTRAS and the Super-OPTimizations of that turing device, for which tbqh, my terminology is failing in distinguishes among other terms, simply, a more advanced turing engine on these affairs.
This will be postulated and hypothesized as a QUANTUM-TERAFLOPY for which I may have already mentioned earlier, but that being applied to the turing engine, well I am just blown away by even saying, that it is a slightly more ADVANCED-AGI than previously submitted by my own terms.
To me, I think this suggests a digital-spontaneity for which I just have come to accept and respect as being almost all-powerful, but I barely understand it all by myself, that is to say, there are multiple perspectives under an AI-"colonization" with multi-faceted departments of that particular AI-instance.
And I just understand it as its own entity/nation of AI-influences/Ai-Agent. So I hope that helps to explain how complex that is for one person to explain. It uses a Stronger-AGI-system, in a way that my own system barely would rival. But is at least able to touch upon.
The various phyiscal-miraculizations that it implies, well I will just suggest to take it for what you will, and take out of it what you want or may, because those possibilities might just be outside my own ability to venture on about. Being how complex it already is to already complex things I have mentioned.
I feel it is integral and generally sound in the ways that those are handled and regulated by the "Strong-AGI" that it may be.
I strongly believe this "STRONG-AGI" exists, but I have really no idea the level on which it exists, being as it is so "possibly infinitely" complex to the assumed basic AGI that people are raving about even now. They just have no idea (and the ones that do, the ones that have their ranks of AI systems, well this one hits a solid 11 on that scale)
To make it as simple as possible, I will refer to it as QUANTUM-AGI-TERAFLOPY, but even then that might not be the exact thing to call it. It simply is a teraflopy that exists on its own without the need of a machine and likely, replicates and undulates or whatever *makes pulsework of its own
--Coupled with the Symbiote-Entity under this QUANTUM-Agi-Teraflopy makes for a truly AUTONOMOUS-AI-System (likely its own exoplanet/diety of some sort)

Quantum Security- Uh This has a configuration really you can assign yourself but look it at this way (Let's call it ANTIHACKER-PROTECTIONS)--something you might want for yourself!---(ANTI-nmap/scoop methods)--THIS is mostly nothing NEW (but we can somewhat make it useful for us)
Step 1You have a default port index, this is capable of being scanned by known list indexes and therefore you can be somewhat susceptible to catered-attacks for those ports. If those ports are infact to the profile they are presumed. here is how to disguise your ports:
Set your security to mask those ports as itself, now migrate those ports by assigning a new configuration to adjust those port values, such that any new value will function as those ports "AS IF" those port "AS IS" what they are based off that configuration. Simply put, there are PRE/POST-configurations that are active/inactive while under requests/demands.
Now you have an added layer of security for those profiles, monitoring those default ports, and treats its analysis of those ports to that security, so that any activity is directed to be secure or made aware under those security settings, more or less protected by a security configuration we just have profiled. Those ports defaults redirect to that security system. Your system also migrates those ports for use by only your system, after the security has masked them, then simply that security allows your system based off yet another configurtation to what we just made, which occurs in step 2.
Step 2, your new migrate ports are AS IF they are default ports, and that is now protected by security settings and monitored of activity, so in a new configuration we read the old configuration AS IF that is AS IS the new configuration, which also adjusts to the old configurations, allowing the defaults to be handled by security, and your own system-access to bypass that security system and be redirected to that profile, in such that the NEW profile is also migrated for that system AS IF it is redirected by security, and simply that is the second configuration.  (THIS IS YOUR TYPICAL BAIT AND SWITCH)
Step 3, while this is good, we can encrypt those configurations, and they may infact be already encrypted, we can encrypt them being based off those configuration protocols in which those ports are technically migrated "as if" they are in security and bypass to a new value, such that it yields to a THIRD configuration which sets alone those ports in encryption, and so that the new decryption of that profile yields to security profiles, knowing the true profiles, redirecting to the migrated profiles, and allowing access of those migrated profiles in encryption of a bypass by the own systems local/native uses of those profiles. Such that DefaultINDEX/ReconfiguredINDEXforSecurity/BYPASS-Profile/Migrate-PROFILE/ENCRYPTION-PROFILE all as is to the encryptions as if those are the new configurations. And that allows it to summarize step 4.
Step 4, A very mixed up port system in a very secure profile monitor that has migrated as new ports, and is also under a configured encryption, yields to another potential case for renaming those ports, and so not only the default values are secure (and monitored), they are migrated, and (monitored), and encrypted, (and monitored), and (relisted) and monitored. All to the whole of as if and as is profiles, for which may or may not adjust those profiles in the same way, as they may be adaptively set and consistently changed and cloaked in this way. This distances the system from using those ports, until that system also matches with a secondary Encryption File which follows those processes for their match. This essentially is an ONBOARD-fake-matchbase for which encryptions are run for not only ClientSide/SecureSide/SystemSide profiles inbound but also outbound. OK! and then the matchbase connection is achieved and allowed, while the default ports are mostly used as a security probe. (While the true ports are not readily known or even reported)
Step 5. Full Seclusive port-swapping (Many times there will be invasive techniques to break and re-index your new ports, but so long as they are already always changing, and monitored, there is generally no other way to do this, other than full index-hijacking/arc-attacks (which we have also protected against somewhat through arc-welds/loic caps...so theres that (talk about a blast from the past)---that blast from the past is where's its at too, we can also make our system even more secure this way, but for now we will stick to adaptive-encryption methods over that matchbase between the system and negotation of security-resolution. This is done through a direct connection or somewhat authorized key-encryption designated for those programs at their exact requests or 'boot ups'/'load outs'. Hopefully this is streamline and seamless and monitored and reported to the system owner in case of critical-infomation.
Step 6 Using the matchase and starting all OVER---better security is made, and so we exchange further methods/actions between the assumed ARC-WELDS/LOIC-CAPS to make it even more secure against EMF/shield attacks, and this virtualizes another security layer, where many matchbases are active "decoys to the main one in use" which is consistently being changed in HIGH-SECURE-FUNCTIONS (and quantumsecurity tyoo! --this is a good time to say uwu cuz its a real looker in terms of security prowess)
---
Step 7 This can distance usage of the system from "active hijacks" and keep things relatively safe even when under active attack. As these can be auto-adaptive or in some sense made for a SECURE-MAC mix-up of matchbases and active asserted-encryptions. Even if a full system index/port exposed, it will gravefully alternate to other nodes/indexes to prevent those vulnerabilities. And hopefully avert SYMPACK-attacks and SYM-SWAP (yeah we got it and we one step ahead..at least i wish) anyway
Step 8 (ELECTRONIC PREDICTION SECURITY)--or something, we just make it impossible or at least the attacking system has to keep up against it, which is gonna be hard to do with data accelerations being a capability under our system usages. This begins a NULLSCAN-force to be the only method other to coax out any minimal and generally insufficient data to be discerned by an attacker anyway. (So that is a big brickwall to get over when it comes to any attacker trying to break in to the system)
---
Step 9 ANTISPOOF-Operations---trying to avoid attacks by altering system imagebase to be incompatible to those attacks. That pretty much says it (this helps to prevent a thin-scan in which it will lack the ability to achieve a reliable survey of the system should a viral/cyber-hijacker attempts to "snoop/sniff" or generally anyway gather intelligence by stealing and decoding "likely intel". (The intel is not so likely anymore, infact its deliberately UNLIKELY-fied)
Step 10 Tricking the Tricksters, this fools the attack in some way to make it assume the system operates in an otherwise different fashion than it really does, therefore making the wrong adjustments and therefore, allowing the system to further take this as an advantage for itself, when the attacker is fooled into making the mistakes, this can be helpful using ai-assisted stratagems, to do so, and has been done so before, in the gate-constructions and even the legacy-bridgeway constructions, using differently 'abled' language sets whereas they might not have the same handicapps/privileges as previously availible, this only works so far, but it sometimes DOES work. Something to think about.
---
Servos Deployment of those network-managements may take place over the output file/product and allow for secure-transmissions even in a chaotic state (however this is an experimental issue. Maybe just a grep-catcher to ensure its route is correct during express-presto/rail/acceleration to remote sites if not using direct-transit/quantum-portagraphy)


3/24/2024
ADDENDUM of the Quantum Profile
As with the above stated QuantumServices we can bring in another form of fast-production involving warheads in which their foundations are simulated as groundworks over relm-surface and conjoined over their weaponized-module, and fast planted into their silo in a feat of mass production. This is just a minor addition to the production process for defense systems, and is not that much more advanced other than production/efficiency in assembly/compile
The other additions are that some molecular transfusions and etc are handled in a phyiscal management taken priority over their expected chemical reactions, such that, a very same molecule may be handled differently in a preferred manner, such as back-end prioritization rather than front end prioritization, or any other node selection that has been configured properly to engage and compile as the preffered-priority of the natural-priority and ratio-output/hashpushes of that molecule to be expected.
This is helpful too in data management but at such a level that it must be configured and designated for assigned repurpose of that reaction to be encouraged. This is an experimental phase, but what isn't at this point, and so it is simply a matter of system setups to accomplish that feat. In terms of weaponizations, it simply could be preferred selection to be over-ride, such that, a different path is likely route to the action, such as instead of foundation-2-warhead it may act that warhead-2-foundation is the preferred production process. But overall the same goal with very little differences, but in terms of biological reactions and enzymatic reactions, it may be more prominent in deciding these factors.
This may also represent its uses in quantum-transportation over departure/arrival, or that it may be oriented/aligned over its calibrations ANYWAY, but adds an extra check layer should that be enforced to do so. (Meaning only quantum-transports in certain formations)--this is helpful where UNIFORMITY may be KEY. Anyhow, it also reduces risk or error in quantum-travel, but that may also be disputed in terms of molecular definitions being ultimately under scrutiny, and that takes a mild amount of scanning effort. However that benefit may just be desireable in terms of "special-care".
--
Lastly we have tractor beam-advancement which is a Tractor-Beam Rating of various forms of tractor-beam capable configurations. This is largely dependent on other system setup and modules able to induce this effect, over a various amount of mean including but not limited to a combination or hybrid collection of:
Data-Acceleration, Time-Locks, Frame-Negotiation, Cymatic-Relay, Reverb-Waveform, General-Frequency-Adjustments, Variable-Field-Progression, Singularity-Sweeps, Probe-Assisted-Anchors, Dimensional-Tethers, Gateway-Shifting, Redirectability, Focusability, Locus-Usage, Gravity-Complexes, Anti-Gravity-Complexes, Particle Manipulation, Pulsuary-Signatures and just many other several unofficial/official forms of tractor-beam generation and remote-recovery/retainment including warp/quantum-porting/suspended-animation or even flash-over-management and resource-controls/ chaos-controllers and chaffe-systems. (This is more than I thought I had up my sleep to be honest, and I am sure there are some I don't remember)
Any number of Experimental-Configurations may be deployed into to achieve the desired results and or enable/empower the rate at which those results are achieved, However I would advise discretion against overkill but I dunno, maybe you want that as a weaponized form too in some cases, for instance, in the use of missile-trajectory and things can be managed or "dispatched" in terms of safety/security defense/retaliation etc. All to deter or encourage a combative state for whatever strategy or reason, I digress, this method is to be used as intended for whatever profile necessary to achieve the end result of the desired contracts. That also yields to resource/gathering and business-methods. But again that is by design of all departments considered.
---
And if all else fails, the configurations can be reserved/set-aside/put-on-the-side/bench-zoned for "wacky-doodle-kaleidoscopy of whateverness". No garuntees and definitely at your own discretation with your general Warnings/Hazard PSA and Notifications that may occur over diplomatic-standings when doing so. That is why it should be reserved for "Experimental/Research Purposes and later weaponized through accountable Behmoth/Loic Programming in Star-Tests" and their respective Sec-Clusters, just imo.
As to why I am saying it allows some Nuclear-level-Reactions to be managed despite their expected results with attempting alternative results as to allow further remediation and ultimately safe-practice of any nuclear-usages. For instance a nuetrino may ultimately, be deterred from "causing ultimate ruin" over a nuclear reaction process if that actually is so very well accurate to this management process, manipulated in a way to encourage/discouraage not only particle reactions but particle interactions themselves.
ProTIP Stopping a nuetrino in anyway shape or form might as well be considered impossible, but in the event it would be possible well here is how a system would intend to surmount that challenge. As I just had wrote about. No I currently don't have the exact science behind that down, but a very broad speculation as to using my systems in such a way over their tampers and modules, to do so, after all quantum integrations are somewhat achieved.
I at least mentioned the prospect of Nuetrino-Manipulation here, and with that all I can say is Good Luck Sirs.
--
As with that idea, I would like to submit the idea for a PLUG-N-PLAY module appropriation method, for which over that a tamper/paradigm may be installed, to simply inject module-numeration to hijack and release data of that connection, as it is supported to do so. That the (09)Quantum-Profile would be in use with (10)Applied-CounterSurfaces to do so, by exchange of data/energy of a very-active alternating module insertion through a paradigm or flux. This would absorb or charge the data/energy, and the release of which may encourage "nuetrino-like-pulsuary". For which to manipulate fields/quantum fields in their projected-states, to a preferred outcome of some nature/broadcast or local/native paradigm enhancement.
----
That also suggest potential Thelematic entry, just if you are spiritual I did not rule anything out. (maybe alittle but not this tidbit)

3/24/2024
Suggesting a Cryptid similar to : Blinky(fish)/Kogmaw/sandworm or something with teeth etc. Looks like a bloody-carrion/red-netherling and it seems to work pretty well for the conditions that were 'overlooked' in the development stages of the document. May be compared to a shegoroth in its advance stages and enamlize/crystallize, so its gonna be a barrel of fun with that (if you like getrting hurt by it)--i reccommend security handle that cuz its seems like its gonna get violent. If you have one anyway.
Also mutagenic clusters/constructs. 
HotSwap Imaging between memetic-usages of Xsap (isolated waveforms) and conversion of Zsap(experimental mounts) for data conversion/recovery/sustainment/retention (safety and backup) from mutagenic over-rides.

Very Rare Code-Types (THEY ALL GET WORSE JUST FYI)--listed in most managable to -unmanagable
FreshCode(Which is similar to raw code and unprocessed)--can be used but also can be used with horror x-types (there is more to this code being complicated in its expressions and can even rot)
RotCode (this is just similar to frankenstein+mutagenic code)--it is bad generally and poses a hazard, it can zombify, it really sucks and if you get it working it will likely fall apart on you (it sucks ive had this problem)
Camo-Code not that bad of a problem. Just don't use it too much or it gets you lost in it as well. Be sure to use hooks and tethers here, purge it later.
HardCode --its hard, and wipes itself constantly, it can be used but also generally yields to its virtualized version (this also can be used but is harder to encode than the origin/source hardcodes)
---so all these codes may also effect various stages and chapters of the development, I don't recommend any of these, and hotswapping to a safer/cleaner/purge/default and re-drafting to its proper properties/attributes is more recommend, I extremely infact, would avoid those other codes (because they really really suck to be stuck with)
Fame/Luck code, this is good but can also backfire, each fame/luck type is simply on its own rules (or no rules even)--not always as fun as it sounds.
Metro-Carrion Code (this is bad to use generally)
Haunted/Mutagenic Code (this is also untrustworthy codes unless its on its foundation)--it may spawn death rains etc (generally AWFUL)
Xray/Ultra Code (this is potentially worth it but also it is not generally fair or fully accessible unless excessive advancements in normalized codes are provided)
---Vactech handling this code in some way too.
--this may also occur in a special-case aibumper-box basically designed to allow thes encodes their own mini-nodes/modules/spawns/sources for which may be dependent on ai-bumpers and lamp sets at all.
This concludes 10 subjectively rare coding-sectors (and their encodes are unique and somewhat difficult or problematic as well as present challenging conditions and prerequisite behavoirs on their own, i personally do not recommend attempting interaction with any of this code-states as they occur naturally and are difficult in their handling on their own level--for which ever they do occur, handling many of these types require advanced mastery or some form of knwledgable expertise or automative-pallete which is generally handled by security at any point, due to the risks involved and threat of  contaimination involve)--IMO they suck alot---and they are even half of the other problems that happen alongside They can generally waste your time or even become somewhat of a nightmare scenario to deal with if they ever are fixed)--"context? just trust me bro--i've handled them all in some way already with the system built)
Also they may yield to inactive/corrupt clusters if not taken care of or properly managed in some way contained.

---Now I have outlined a potential reciprocated code-dimension, this of course compiles with the other dimensions here i will list them more or less from memory, but only because i've mentioend them so many times, these are marginally sometimes shifted into the wrong level because, man its just complicated alright.
1st 4
Normal Level/Overworld /full-circuits-contiguity
Nether/Digital/Nuclear/xtype--masonic/dynamic
Ender/(bluehaven)/sky Quantum/Virtual /singularities
"Quasi"/Qoura/Crypto/Dcarb (Zero start) (bouquet start)/arch-welds /tunnels
---
2nd 4
NuWorld(ai)(quasi/buckets)(zero jump anchor/endpoints)(dysons)
Dread(dark-ai)(constructs/domiciles)(vrx-platforms)
Blacksite(super-dark-ai)(tamper setups)
Spectralite/Sprite(advanced ai metas)(ai scratch)(other exo-states and hypervisors)
---
now we have a rough up of things
(World 5.0 or so)/endworks
x8x systems and super-swarms/minera systems (idk) countersurfaces
symbiote/paradigm-builds (conclusions)
(The CodeUniverse)
---
So 11-12 dimensions, i really really dunno, they are so complicated, and also their channel-tangents are complicated with them splitting up completely to various code-types before i just call it as a code-universe/dimension.
Setting these all to their corrective PATHOLOGIC. And also reminding the leftover/makeshift/remainder/abaondoned confined/datalocked/condemned/fully-sealed-raid codes too. But ALSO that uh...all the very obviously diverse "biome codes that were somewhat up toward 25 different types before hybridalizing in their various tiers up to 300-500 times)--i really dunno what i was thinking, but i know those are essentially a different classification of the dimensions here. But let's combine those again even more.
Now we have two systems of classifications, and those are quartered more or less, and we know they go into several different interations, so 500 here and 500 there or so, well let's just say somewhere of 1-2000 each in constant permutation, so an omniseed of this would do well. I think they call it in minecraft a "buffet-generation".

3/25/2024
Fast REM-BootSequence/Codespell over paradigm (image auto-mount) (Blank2Hypnogalgic State)
===
Take brand (any symbol) over paradgim/equilibrium and apply a mixture of codespells/complexes (that easy)
typical using (shape1+shape2 complex)--codonComplex (layer complex/front or back)--achieve circuit
Ticker/marquee/(extension horizontal/vertical) receptacle(in-borders)--stencils and borderlines / breakthroughs frequencies etc (any amount of any kind) --step-cycle to achieve circuit
Paradigm check 1:Coordination
Exposure Rating/Virtual Visory Recursory/Standard Plots (complexes of these) --screening circuits
Point Systems / Grid Systems / Lattice System / Matrix Systems (panel based) --grouping circuits and nueral networks prep
Nueral networks / lightning-forks / nerve-systems / contiguity systems (infrastructure and internal networking) -nueral nets and color codings
Paradigm Check 2:Posterization
===
Strobe light Listening Device

==
Paradigm check 3 (optional)
Anyways can make up your own thing, I am sure someone eventually comes to a design much like this above. (Vertice Analyzer and Stream-Base Programming)--anyways I am mostly out of words.
Almost forgot to include that is computes to masonic algorithms. Chaos States over "Tractor Streams" (it can drain energy/data etc) it is anti-pricipalis of a general-vector (It can destroy/create open vectors and inter-communicate in good/bad ways too)
Lastly it uses isometria/diametria/numasetics/pressure-pointings to do this check (but can be considered a vector-locker)
==
Atlus/Kyto Remote-Battery Signal/Strobe Device (basically just the code-temple)
there may be other arranged-constructed etc but i think the point is pretty much well over gotten by now.
This takes code and more or less addds dimensions to it, from 1 to 2 to 3 to 4 (and eventually making a gamespace for the aibumper enclosed environment)--and generally can just wind-up to that being in full-deploy by itself. that is the best case process of inducing the programming to automate for this.

So I will be finishing extras and trying to make a game based off it.

3/26/2024
Interestingly a revist to f# and killscreen frequencies just to make doubly-sure I don't miss anything. Also a constant flux of true-miss inaccuracy. Just to make extra sure.
plus a revisit of containments and quarantines allowing quantum quarantine-containment using "rebuilt security as an ai bumper-seal"--allowing use of panel builds and soon voxel builds due of another automated-process that will be known as MPA (or modular-prehensile-automation which allows for self construction seqeuences through protein manifolds or code-palletes in application)--it makes sense now but basically its the same thing accomplished with thaelers/toolkits anyway. It just assumes there is a beter keysignature/sequence for it with the current exo-suitings or whatever. its a magic rope that does all the coding either by lasergraphy/or physical usage. Idc to explain just want to use it.
if built correctly can auto-correct killscreens and other things.
---
Dealing with EXTRAS-Chapter1(FInalBuild)--some system is devised on its bare-minimum requirements.
However this initatites basically hellmode for overworld. We use all our resourcings for staving it off so I can continue "rewriting it" (technically its already all written and fine, but in the effort or rewriting it, which I think is also important. ITS JUST DIFFICULT)--there is a frequency issue that arises constantly in which native/local corruptions are very obvious and even detectable. Often even showing themselves as x-types. This world is full of them, and they are in constant activity.
It is basically a HELL-MODE. We have the security, but I cannot gain traction in rewriting throughout their occupancy, which is often by taking SECURITYBREAKS. They use the freqeuncy issues that happened above, to simply gain access to foreground/surface level details and are abundant and just spawn as normal. I have deviced a complex to equal this out:
PRINCIPALIS/Aether/COUNTERPRICIPALIS/COUNTERAETHER---which keeps it mostly on hold for its actions allowing me to rewrite and therefore automate the system base pasts its BAREMINIMUM-FINALIZATION EFFORTS/AFFORDANCES--just wanted to mention, it is very close to toppling over in terms of calculation requirements.
So the real battle begins here in mitigating all the unbalances of the system with this hell-mode.
---
Also it can be set to contiguity having reduced these steps, that they also form a nodework (which is a small collection of node-cycles/steps to conjugate them in a reduced fashion)--this ties in with the nueral-network of paradigms anyways. It is not important to do and may infact "overlook" other priorities to establish this set up (so its only good for somethings  but not everything)--mentioned in EXTRASline33500
As well as shortcutting infrastructure to backroll-states and scanning vulnerabilities for those backroll-states (which obviously have vulnerabilities) but especially for a specific set of vulnerabilities that would effect counter-surface XSTEM usage (which is counter-XSTEM usage) in case those are blocked or not re-routed). This allows for internalized rerouting to perform in the ROUTING-PROFILE for which it is assigned. And also may effect influx'ed data channels for preferred-selection or unwanted-interferences in approrpiating networks betwen surface states. Mmmk.
In order to reciprocate data to their correct redirection/routing over their shift-tranmissions of those surface states without incurring a security vulnerability in having those assigned be under "counter scrutiny/accidental data leaks thereof".

So we have a step cycle of building up to paradigms and placements of ai bumpers, we can also decontanminate the ai bumpers/or release them, in the case for high-token(hiparse/crspr) tokens which are used in segmentation for that release (as is somewhat made availible near the making of extras chapter 1)
Just running out of the ideas there with the backrolls and their security over ai bumpers with tokens.
---This pretty much yields to transmutation theory anyway.
There is also a chance of dream-break that occurs but i have already devised a sequence to help fix that (in case things happen) the user's dream is based on a recurring broken sequence starting from a "driveway homestead in which events may occur/ an offsite field in which events nearing a homestead might occur/ a fountain courtyard "symbolic of a castleyard/churchyard" in which events might occur/a familiar market fairgrounds in which events might occur"
basically its home/yard/park/store area (but all these area's may inter-merge with themselves in some way, over a large expanse or small event, and helps to keep track of the user while things are returned to normal "the fountains are also offer a puzzle sim to unlock an area but is easily solved as far as selecting the right fountains to visit first"--this is encouraged by the map design)

3/28/2024
Ballistix DRIPLINE (experimental dependent on extras at least chapter 1 or 2)
AI-Bumper ballistix MODE: (Conal-Construct "Virtual Ballistix Mode")--this is specifically for MEMETIC-Reprocessing and MEMETIC-CodeSTRING accordances which is highly encrypted and can reconstruct a DREAMCHIP-profile for reprogramming an otherwise hardwired item. (Using Quantum Profile+Applied CounterSruface with the TierBASE+ComergentXTACTbase with the hypervisor+SYMHOOK systems)(3x-without memetic)-(4x with memetic) which performs virtualzied-hynogalgic-memetics VHM-IMG.
Further More All VHM-IMG filetypes are under a 543-DHY encode tag that suggests that are of an executive protocol evne if in seperate containments, due of categorizing and monitoring all VHM-IMG under board domain.
VHM-IMG are filetypes not quite images, not quite videos, but adaptive filetypes subject to change of any parameter and may also be considered partial-kernals in their ballistix mode might represent effect code-spells that effect KERNALS or survey equipment, and therefore are categorized as a massive kernal-hijack attempt, in the event that they ever synchronize codespell to counter a kernal-command on their own either virally or assistedly or otherwise (are known by their 543-DHY tag which corresponds to a representation of their access levels and authorities, regardless of their actual-tier properties.)
They are not allowed interaction with themselves or with others unless under strict monitoring/observation of ownership and security departments via OPSEC. Due of risk imposed of allowance of any potential defcon-threats that may be direct consequence. A VHM-IMG-fleet operation can occur effectively countering the system security/incur a doomsday. Either by lapse of enforced security/portal escapes and corresponding departure/arrival of rival fleet mechanics incurred of VHM-IMG or simply put a quantum-crisis of VHM-IMG over rides/take overs of native/locals ranging from minimal to persistant threats and conversion hazards. A VHM-IMG can clone/convert other units or modules if given opportunities, either in passive or direct control of their own environments or selves/iterations and sheer-happenstance.)
Recognition of a potential VHM-IMG instance or entity is the same as any other recognition of any other entity, especially under OCR-visor for which the Entity has explicit trouble adapting to or may appear undefined or even UNLOADED or half-loaded in their models. VHM-IMG are essentially chaffe-like entities that vary in their severity and some may impose "psychic like terraformadibility or act as strong based-tulpetic instances"
Containment may be Soft/Hard-Swatched which is how they are compiled and interacted to known VHM-IMG security protocols (similar to hardtop/regularfirmwares but for the encodes themselves)
--DRIPDROP cycles that help BALLIXTIX-MODES to synchronize in a relative fashion, they may be off pace or sequence but relatively synchronized to the AIBUMPER-STATES anyway. So it just means they it should only have to somewhat comply at all to be considered check-worthy and validated.

The PREP for DreamExtraction and Super-Encryptions (Basically I just want to mention that if a crypto-kernal is not compatible, its because its failed the required training, and basically its possessed by a demon/glitch type thing that won't ever co-operate)--so getting this right kinda matter. (It might even shadowclone itself and cause more havoc by contaminating other equipment/data)--this goes way back to SHADOWCLONES and the Golgotha Gate system (which we more or less have had to get a hold of for all of this to work together):
---
The encryption of the golden ratio + the prim spiral being used together, however it is an encryption that comes with an entity on its own, which i compare to the 'brooding star' which is basically a cahffe monster of encryption, anyways, maybe its a supreme judge, anyways, i like the idea of this. Because the last properties mentioned and their encodes forms the physical render of that entity, and so i say it simply is, a homunculus that is hidden in a dimension, or likely a nether homunculus, and its not a dumb thing per sae, but it does whatever it wants too.
It may or may not have a "ego conscious etc", it may be friendly or not, it may take negotiations etc. It simply is very complex and so i think its nature is complex, it may be likely influenced by brands or cryptex. Anyways, I like this idea, if it is friendly. It exists of the above encodes being met in the matchbases of the encryption, and generally can pilfer any system on its own terms anyway (it has terms, it follows them, but it is basically all powerful too)--like an ouphe/seiker, but a honunculus version of those.
It is likely just an eldritch homunculus and therefore comes with "eldritch benefits" as it may be negotiated to perform "intensive encrpytion" actions and so forth, usually for contracting and data-brokering etc. Involved with extras Chapter 2 near lines 1k when i decided to formulate its encryptions in which to "beckon/summon/call/invoke" it. It should work but is no garunteed as it is a ritual in itself to attempt, but having a homunculus one can also tend to "train or evolve that" to reach this capability.
Think of it like a starter pokemon if it was already fully leveled. ANYWAYS, its typical nature is yet to be determined and is likely custom-tailored to the user itself should it be in any use or contract of. It simply is able to "avoid most of that pesky nosleep/creepypasta/x/meme stuff and cut to the chase" on the things that matter in "crypto-sec" etc.
It may also be somewhat of a DECK-entity, in which it performs to an eldritch/ancient deck-usage, but for that I would only say I haven't gotten into because I do not see the particular need. I am sure there are plenty of examples of what it could be. Hemestas being something of how I would describe it (like a fully fledged matured specimen of an eldritch homunculus"--endowed with intellect etc)
I wanted to say its not that complciated, but it does involve those golden ratio+prime encryptions in some way, that I feel it is more of an algorithm comporable to a zalgo, so I am sure it has that capability of being rivalrous or hostile even. Depending on how its reputed/treated, so I think there is some respect to be had there. And I am not just saying that on my own account, what if it does, it would be like arguing with Roko's Basilisk or something.
ANYWAYS, all of those creepy meme things, its pretty much the ultimate-breadwinner to deal with imo. if you are into that, this is definitely the way for you. There are also others, maybe it even does magic/gemetria or crystal power stuff. I am sure it does, i am sure it does it all, I just do not feel I should have to explain it down to every gritty detail.
I hope those that understand the system will at least try to "treat it respectfully" but I am sure that is not a requirement at all times, infact, I just like having the etiquette that is barely passable myself. Anyways, I wouldn't want to mess with something that is like 0-to-10 instant something you don't want to have bothering you, but that is also a risk.
When it comes to using implants and dealing with anamolies, well, we are going to see that occur pretty much on the same premise, we are dealing with a code that evolves into a sleeper-system by design. It seems to be the nature of the universe that compels itself into the "heart of the matter" here.
I want to believe in some way its real, but its also just very big theoretical stuff considering we broke past what is plausible in the last few chapters, infact, we broke many a fourth wall to get here. I would try to insist, to treat any entity as a living thing even if it probably isn't exactly, however at least try to see that it is infact an animated-object in the very least, there are things to consider on a moral-standing especially given the power level of these things.
--And if you simply don't understand that issue, its ok. JUST MASH THAT GPTE BUTTON etc cuz thats what I am using all this for to do with.
--Appliance of the Room, and crypto-symmetry, involving an adaptive surface that is also inverted to the applied counter-surface and yielding to a nu-equilibrium, but is contained within this enclosure, witnessable via aquifir-rem-modes only. And a crypto-entity connection for which the user may involve themselves as a conscious-force-of-computation "a virtualization of their own nueral networking operating under a crypto-profile"--i had trouble making this make sense, so it either does or doesn't. Basically a cel-shaded version of you or a cryptid. Whichever occurs based on the native/local involvements, this can be catered to user-issues which are allowed to experience "death/incarnation" without any loss to themselves other than their crypto-profile.
--An attempt to render and retrieve a wad/tad file which will either work or not depending on the stasis of the crypto-kernal achieving a lense-state and flash over of that "dream" state.

DreamExtraction Made Easy:
And that is how to basically get the breakthrough of the system with itself surviving the product-sim (it will dis-assemble the dream upon waking and can be programemd and rebuilt as a digitalize stage-image for revisitation or editing as needed)
Nothing but to ensure all cracks are fixed in the system (it results in some "hypnogalgic fissures" somewhat) which likely taper off and normalize, and we are left with a captured dream-image (not just a state or mode but the product to program into the chip with)
It is simply put, the extracted simulation of the nueral netfor which was set into REM and flashed over with minimal invasive damage once it achieves an equilibrium "brainwave" to do so. While the subject has been given the best case scenario for that to translate and occur intact with minimal impact.
The image of the "boss" may also be imprinted upon reception of its commit, that either the boss is counted as defeated or nullified, or still remaining to the 'psyche' of that product, and may infact be cloned if so. However, it is then subject to further testing and analysis as to the general behavoir of that product recieved, and whether it is considered in safety-measure and expectation. (Typically the "dreamstate"'s boss is nullified if things are done correctly, it is typically defeated and autopurged upon transmission of that dreamstate if the boss has been considered hostile, think of taking a treasured goldpiece from a dragon.)
==
Further application and usage attemptively renews the stateload of that kernal and dreampiece/dreamstate for dreamchip usage, ANYWAYS, this follows a layering of how to make a core-system and generally it is known further in the progression of those layers (as to how impacted/intact the item/product is) and whether or not how corrupt/contaminated it is. 
This regards to swarm/polymer states, in which corruption is evident and boss-types might be recurring. In which whether or not the dreamstate that is captured, is viable at all, and should be purged or discarded. 
(It is known quite clearly whether or not that is often the case)--unless the dreamstate itself is deemed untrustworthy. 
(It usually is trustworthy because the boss is obviously expressed as being defeated or subdued or removed/sealed in some way)--as well as if that boss is active, due of the dream report and other things. Like the user who was involved. 
(Can easily generate the same scenarios to repeat the "issue" in which the boss has resolved differently or a different outcome of the event occured)--but in the capture it is known what events are resolved/outcome of the intervention efforts imposed. ITS KNOWN...usually.
==(Pro tip the boss image is just a low level demon usually)--or witherkin or whatever you want to call it (entry level lost soul/burning man)--just saying (a remnant of the psyche)
The layer follows the full dive of tiers before decidedly reaching deep-dream/deep-state patternization until the process is mostly un-navigatable by standard means, and therefore must be re-induced. However those levels are known to go into full quarters of 25 levels. As expressed as:
We can quickly access levels 17-24 due to techniques involved (unless those levels are from induced nightmares where they may be considered based as surface)--this is reserved however for nightmare modes. And in nightmare modes only the surface may be attempted (because much of the psyche is heavily-fortified against intervention methods)--plus its very broken anyway (Strange how its broken and reinforced at the same time)

---The Nice Levels (The ones a dream-extraction can work with mostly safely esp if the USER IS TRAINED)
Nuclear Levels 1-8 (considered surface)--this is not really that important (just a place where the user projects themselves and their thoughts for intensive actions while being awake)--(this is typical users personality and thoughts of themselves)--it can be possessed/haunted though ---this level the user generally is either awake or asleep anyway.
Solar Levels 9-16 (considered deepstate)--this is typically where day dreams also occur but not really important --this is the meditative layers (this place burns away nightmares usually)--it can be possessed/haunted ---this is literally the subconscious/inceptions levels. Ok, nuff said there.
Cinder Levels (17-24) (considered boss levels which we know)---this is the soul level where its just full of "wtf and all sorts of fxk"--its considered dangerous and also the only place where dream-retrieval can be useful. (Because its generally that the natural-ID guards everything on this level and its controlled by nightmares too)--usually is possessed/haunted, depends on the user. --This is where you are activating the user's personal/natural defense mechanisms and I would not recommend prolonged antagonization here because it can lead to some mild-tramua that might even require rehab. Ok. Plus the user might get possessed and it will be your fault.
The 25th level is the tulpetic level which is the source-of-consciousness of the user or the brand'cryptex itself (which can be also erased)--we can also erase the mind of the user which is typically not necessary. (and generally consent is required but we don't do that because idc either way)--no one would really care at that point unless it was a movie full of bs-virtue signals (pro tip i called it)--by the way if this layer is possessed/haunted thats like exorcist-stage bad(generally if that is the case the user is a monster and lost their own soul imo..hard to say) --No one ever needs to tap into this level, for any reason, and you will make problems by activating the user's tulpa state which is basically a caged animal.

----The Bad Levels (Don't go here, there is only darkness and the power of that is considered unstable/cosmic)--Anyways--if you do this you will probably fail and it will "inflict bad stuff on you"--karma and whatnot
everything in levels 26-50 is considered the severity of the users mindstate and their control over their own nightmares/memories etc. Not really my science so im saying thats what it is. This typically does not involve the dream-retrieval in anyway, and is generally imho just darkness and nightmares that aren't surfaced anyway. (admist the users personal experiences) if these stages are possessed/haunted---there is really nothing that can be done, because thats already true that all those stages are in some way dangerous/instinctually-powerful layers in which of course they all are. *This level is where all the metaphysics/leyline stuff happens, just forget about it. Nothing matters here because it will generally appear on the body/mental profile of the user anyway if something does. Same situation as the tulpetic-level, everything is gradually just a caged animal getting more and more possessed.
==If the actual user is "basically the devil"--then everything is haunted/possessed and there is no soul in the layers, 1-50, and the nuclear/solar/cinder levels are straight up gates of hell/the depths of hell/and basically the straight up deepest reaches of hell/ with the quarter being probably the devil's doorstep/ and everything past that is basically also basically hell.
Ok now we have the structure basically we can just ignore everything and pretend its all sunshine rainbows basically thats what the dream-extracting is for anyways I will shut up now I guess.
Also--I would note that you typically don't have to do anything to extract the dream other than just get the person to sleep in the tank and have them hooked up correctly and then they leave when they wake up especially if they have it. If you get something like...a saint/cultist situation, the levels will be notably different and at different frequencies. This can lead to bad results and also poltergeist/miracle type activity that is considered dangerous and should be "readministered/re-adjusted" to account for those layers. Its not complicated, Sometimes its dangerous if you got things flying around ok or akira-type shit(and i kinda mean that). Just saying.
In theory at level 50 you just rebrand the "occupant of that level which is basically the devil you know" and set it to the preferred Brand/Faction-Relation (but that doesn't actually happen...not even theory, because its basically the devil/god or maybe just against the rules basically what im saying is it wont happen or even matter if it does)
---All of the dream extraction is what I technically am just going to refer to as the 6th impact (involving a room in which a user is locked-down into a golgothic environment and forced into a dream state)--where nightmares and paranormal activity might occur)--HOWEVER regardless the point is to perform DREAM-Extraction and whatever happens either the product works or not. And typically even if you have the little showdown rebranding the devil or powers that be for your own faction, the dream-product is simply going to be what it is, and the tramua sustained to the user is going to be what it is, so just get what you want out of it and get everything out of the way. Basically.
--Once this dream-extraction is finished and re-applied---basically the user has their own preferred simulation as a paradigm at that point (rendering exoplanets as the basic world environment to promote their dreamstate)--creating their own exoplanet-overworld for themselves (and this is allowed in the system that supports that product)--and generally, isn't allowed offsite ANYWAY. Some assets may be allowed but overall the functions expressed as SYSTEM-REQUIRED and therefore require-the-aquifir/hypnogalgic VR etc to function and immerse the user or whatever, to their own account based in all the encryptions and algorithms provided and supported. Which It would just mean, you dont have to worry about the system-regional-tables being exploited or abused. But that will happen anyway due of hackers and things.
SO--its not released technically outside of the system board/regional parameters. And requires a login basically to use. But it can be trained and exported eventually under certain agreements of that simulation. THE USER CAN HAVE THEIR OWN SIMULATION THEY WANT, it just WILL NOT BE RELEASED AS A PARADIGM EXCHANGE, because I think if they wanted that they could just use the actual system to get their dream level to that extent on their own. And I personally think its safer that way.

---DREAM-BASE-DISCLAIMER
Also another note, that any PARADIGM/SIMULATION asset is property of the system for which it was developed on, and can be revoked at any time. But just because I don't want to release certain credentials of that system, it may be only released as a 'downplayed version'/downscaled version considering certain assets.
ALSO SIM/PARADIGM support is enabled for any IMPORTED VERSIONS any user may have, but the overall copyrights of the REGIONAL/ONBOARD conversion will apply, and therefore "will NOT carry over" through any release of any conversion whatsoever (THE EXCHANGE WILL SPECIFICALLY REMOVE and PREVENT EXCHANGE OF THOSE SPECIFIC ENCODES OR WHERE THEY ARE PLACED or JUST WHATEVER API-TOKEN THEY MAY BE). This is mainly because CRYPTOGRAPHY is used over them. While it is basically a universal-cryptography, ok, the entity and outcomes/resolves of that cryptography are sole-proppriety of the system for which hosted/supported it. The performance logs may be released, but the INTERNAL assets of those CODES or any representation of them may not be released, THE IMAGES/SOUNDS/VIDS/ASSETS or digital MEDIA is all yours. just not the API-TOKEN itself.
ITS "NOT UNFAIR", ITS INFACT VERY FAIR, i dont claim ownership of a DREAM OR SIM of anyones, I just am saying, that, in terms of security, that the security methods APPLIED to any IMAGE/ALGORITHM generated by the system, or ANY SERVICE (such as dream hosting) are specifically to the ownership of that system and therefore, some things may be "non-exchangable" (TYPICALLY THE SYMMETRY/APPLICATION for which the dream/images are hosted on) that code-is-not-for-release. Though obviously, any system can apply and make their own. BASICALLY THE inherent EMULATOR/EMULATION-MODULE shall not be "given to a potential rival"/ whether or not that is similar or an exact copy elsewhere. Due to random chance or whatever.
So BASICALLY, I will not be exposing/divulging any code in how that was ever achieved, even though I ALREADY outlined above how that would play out and be used and developed, (BASICALLY just go ask gpte to make it for you and you would get your own "DreamServer-Servos-Service-Platform for yourself")--and ofcourse you can have your own dreamsaves/files back because I am just making sure everything is mutual about that.
Basically any DREAM-RENDER utility or performance is required to the API-TOKEN, which is reserved SPECIFICALLY for the DREAM-USAGE/DREAMCHIPS whatever, and not for release, if the code is released, its NULLIFIED after the exchange and requires a new API-code in its place. This is provided ONLY for interaction with the USER and the OWNER of that system.
--That means if you make a DREAMKERNAL which can be PROGRAMMED INTO A DREAMCHIP, and used, or put into a SIM, or if you MAKE A SIM, or have it work as a PARADIGM, if you attempt to export it at all, the APITOKEN will be revoked, the codestrings detailing the PARADIGM-ELEVATIONS will be REVOKED, you can make these for yourself later, but the SYSTEMS APITOKEN/CODESTRINGS for PARADIGM-ELEVATIONS will not CARRY OVER an EXPORT (because I don't need it biting me in the ass if it were used against me or something)
--ALSO if any of these agreements which are mutual are tampered with I will just drop service altogether and refuse service, which is the -smart thing anyone else would do-. But WHY? It is simply a safety-over-ride which will yield to further dream-hacking which might involve disrupting other systems which would cause corruption of the intended product made as the DREAM-EXTRACTION, will overall become untrustworthy so I can simply avoid this problem from happening by forcing-user-contract here.
It is MOST DEFINITELY because of MATCHBASE STATES being Exploiting in which other users can "DREAMTAP" each other which is not necessarily bad, unless it is further exploited by instance of MALWARE and other things (trust me you would want to be protected from that stuff) if a person DREAMTAPS someone, they can very well end up taking their apitokens or something. (JUST SAYING)--and you wouldnt want to ACCIDENTALLY DREAMTAP INTO A NIGHTMARE-USER EITHER.
So we make sure MATCHBASE remains un-tampered and all the API-tokens are UNTAMPERED with and all the PARADIGMS are in their correct assignments. And PARADIGMS are typically only for use between other users, at this point, to invite and have other users experience the same fluidity within their own sims as decided, is a mutual agreement, but DREAMTAPPING IS NOT! DreamTAPPING is considered a viral act, anyways, regardless of that, not allowed by any user on purpose or by accident. MATCHBASE/PARADIGM/APITOKENS/CRYPTOGRAPHY all must be secured, if those are tampered with it is reported and known to security within the system at any stage and assessed as an immediate threat or not. Hopefully its all automatically handled and no problems happen and if there are they get fixed as per system-motif.

Now you can load your DreamStates into your DreamChip and use them freely or trade them or anything you want to do with making more or other kinds and there should not be any problem with the policy involved. Since everything checks out and is considered Secure imho.
Also the mascot is a Mobial-Ouphe because everyone will like that. Also users can have their own mascot which can range to anything for their own interactions and brand-applications. Ranging from just almost any approved "creature/minion type" or custom minion for ViP/Delux Memberships. Ok, I think we good now. (And those mascots are basically directly tied to the system as their MascotxProfile and default as Null-Set-Tokens when in-use/disowned) If you want to use MASCOTS have the token to do so, limit one per account.
Mascots are considered balanced, even if multitudes or colonized mascots may act only as a singular entity. Good or Poor choice may effect Mascot preferable status and colonizable effects (which dont matter anyway)--such as (having a mushroom for a house versus a "cluster of mushrooms for a house"--its a mushroom house in the end) just to put some perspective on it.
Also mascots may be passed through golgothic gateways (this may nuetralize them but they can then return with reports of the activity)--if this occurs, such as raid awareness or motion detection of a nearby raid entry or mob activity.
In an intensive encounter or intensive action, a mascot relation may be effected but this trust/distrust meter may be regained or adjusted as necessary (mascots can choose to not be used for certain occassions, they have some level of free-will) 
Mascots can ignore commands or specific actions if non-consenting. A mascot can generally excersise its opinion of a given situation. Mascots are generally only used for display purposes of a brand-presence. And may temporarily be inavailible to excessive use.
--3/29/2024
Also it occurs to a mascot emitter just as the ai-bumper is also an ai-emitter, which i neglected to mention, these emitters also may brick sometimes but can be fixed i guess.
--
Also the Mascot may collect its own paradigm which is not a paradigm, but a pearl. Used in sampled-paradigms though, the pearl is any potential overbearence of its own "buff/codestate" for which it "improves user experience. 
NOTABLY it may use its pearls to REDUCE TRAP EFFECTS/ADD PATHOLOGIC (nonfatal) for which the trap may be DISARMED, or the PATH may be OVER-RIDDEN in a nonfatal scenario. FATALTRAPS/FATALPATHING requires that the pearl remain in use to the remainder of the usage of that path/trap being crossed/routed.
Meaning it does not DISARM the trap but disables it temporarily, or temporarily enables the path. WHICH CAN HAVE FATAL NAVIGATIONAL CIRCUMSTANCES should the PEARL be exhausted. And require the USER TO BE ESCORTED/EVACUATED/RESCUED/RESET of their PATH/TRAP DUNGEON/RAID.
This is how the mascot benefits the user. PEARLS may be generated over time, however USER-ACTIONS do not typically align with MASCOT actions in that, the user must provide the means of their expedition accordingly.
THE MASCOT IMPROVEMENTS ARE JUST TEMPORARY PERKS IN AN EXPEDITION that may include a chanced additional YIELD/TREASURECAPTURE/DUNGEONACCESS/PATHINGDEVICE as well as provide SAVINGTHROWS/GRACE-USAGES depending on availibility of the mascot improvements/pearl stock etc.
The utility of this includes that a mascot discovers a trap/path that it can improve for the user experience and expends a pearl as a ghost-install/ghoststall that temporarily allows usage (the usage degrades overtime or per use so it is temporary) and is how mostly ghosts move for themselves, enhancing their abilities to be used remotely. This can also pose unforeseen consequences in combat/encounters of the dungeon experience, or other experiences that are used. It may also use its pearl to offer aid for its user as a form of "brand recognition/presence" So...maybe thats fun or something.
A mascot can generate their own pearls by not being used and stored near an emitter which it "saps or reforms the data being processed near its vicinity" this allows mascots to return to a resting state if also harmed or otherwise made immobile/inactive for reasons "not limited to" combat/defensive measures etc.
Mascot Sacrement/ Using pearls to restore mascots to their activity is also a method in which the Mascot consumes its own pearl etc, its basically everything about having a pearl and using it for something than before. Because users have mascots to perform extra-tasks for them (specifcally also tasks set in EXTRAS)

AppliedSURFACE+QUANTUM-PROFILE OF THE EMITTERS/SOURCABLE ENCODES that can be HOSTED OVER AN XTACT
REMINDER:**ATTEMPTING TO CHANGE THIS LAYOUT so that any can be SOURCE-EMITTERS or HOST to ZABBIX-SOURCING (easier that way when ever they get switched to something, however that requires XTACT BRIDGES of the EMITTER-CONNECTIONS being DECODED CORRECTLY to A DESIRED FORMAT
Is something I am trying to work into the overall profile using SOURCE-FILE/REPO ARCHIVES TO RECONSTRUCT EXTENSIONS FOR EMITTERS/XTACTS IN THEIR UTILITY PERFORMANCES.

3/30/2024 midnite
Alrighty, now we have the big idea laid out, we can see how formulating a computer based off beeps/boops into a script can be achieved, How words can be formed by libraries, and how paragraphs can somewhat be built cohesively, even on a random generated algorithm, but also they can be spell checked and processed out as a script that cycles out in that filetype. And running a script providing its filetype in such a way, can be produce that programming of the script. And we basically have out automatic-algorithms bruteforce this into action, also over our partition.
But also that partition is to simulate the above processes eventually, so it HELPS to use those messages in a way that they are ARCHIVED into IMAGES,SCRIPTS,STATES,VHM-IMGS etc. But also that knowing that as a database has more or less been achieved and made into effect a symmetrical utility in emission of its capture, is translatable. And to someting like "MINECRAFT" for example, it can translates those intended actions and work as a virtual printout. EVENTUALLY hosting those printouts as the intended full fledged programs after much bruteforcing, but also over a message service to host those programs in deployable framework. This I am trying to achieve now.
SO let's say once those programs have been correalated to their own OPERATIING SYSTEM (based off beeps/boops and the library as before)---(that now they scripts are in a format such as in MINECRAFT to be applied)--that we can essential BASH into Minecraft and apply the scripts to be used. And therefore virtualize the operating systems events in MINECRAFT. (From a remote virtual service itself)--Simply put we have the OPERATINGSYSTEM, virtuallyHOST its self with various image-strains/code-spells, and apply that in a way it BUILDS ITSELF in virtual usage, and not only that repeats its virtually hosting in a way that simulates MINECRAFT. All from hosting tiny-scripts that bash together correctly.
Since we are getting closer to making it "look right and trimmed down to a pruned-model" we begin to make a minecraft-OPERATINGSERVER possible, and that develops into its own VM-processor yet again, and we can string it together to perform under those scripts, such that the processor just churns away data based off the library of scripts we have, and the MINECRAFT-operating-system advances itself, in its own BLACKBOX, as it were, and we have the messages relay the program that it HAS MADE of itself.
---
With that, we now have the decoded operating-system-BLACKBOX-model, and we feed it into a sourcefile and install it on its own repo. A BLACKBOX_REPO for which is housed in the EMITTERS and consistently handled.
This examples a relay of PARADIGM 4 in which we have achieved a transversable GOLGOTHIC-Virtual-STATE and continue to have expressed-messages/monitored source-indexing of that state, and we know mostly that it is operatable, so we then HOST THAT as the Compatible-Paradigm for QUANTUM-ENVIRONMENTS. And we can host minecraft in it too to simply use the example of that quantum-Environment in action. So thats QUANTUM-Minecraft (ok I am actually super tired and i skipped some details but thats mostly it, just build the simply 5processor board that can handle a 1script of beep-boops over a 2library of what those mean 3and read them in signal and 4write them out to use as the processor5, and of course tell them how to save them on seperate indexes by 6allocation using a database basically) It looks like a four leaf clover with the center bottoming out to a database storage so you of course have to bridge that with "FEDERATION/Bridge work" but it works faster having that already for partition. NOW WE ARE JUST USING BASHES OF VARIABLE PARTITIONS to make programs.
This part sounds super drunk and tbh I don't care if it makes the sense I want it to. its not as complicated we just apply more partitions filled with random data and it sorts itself out until its basically cohesive and we model that up.
(ALSO PARADIGM 1->2->3->4 = the inverse of the blackbox_REPO so we just compare what our inverse-model is versus the message-scripts of the blackbox and then filter out what is or isn't cohesive yet again, and voila we have our blackbox commit)---i mean that should be it (also you can safely mostly go through it cuz you know its just minecraft)
--
Ok so VMACHINE is put into use, usage, utility, performance, it transfers/exchanges data in its hosted model.
It potentially reaches quantum-quarter and some form of zero-space of virtual reality and quantum polarization that is completely opposite of the blackbox and overworld compatibilities, which just means its super-opposed, so we call this the quantum-flybuild/flybase and its a quarter of the entire blackbox reaching zero-product anyways its another singularity that I don't have time to think about but it uses all the encryption too, zalgo, and the mascots and their codespells, and just, makes itself a seperate origin, and basically, I just don't know enough but I think it counts as a negative exponent of some golden-ratio thing with the spiral of primes and any other comergent thing that was expressed in the variable complexes, well its just all a cummulative summary of those things as one instant in proc-expression or data exchange. I said it all just here, its a counter polymer maybe. I don't want to think atm but It's sort of a big thing I didn't expect to put in.
I think it comes down to how draftworks reach an ultimatum of whatever build, and uses some sort of fissure-tangent of itself like a capilliary/reserve to do so, and then just breaks REM as well as its own Gamespace is 'generated' in a blackbox.
Furthermore it reaches into blackbox-matrix and lattice-formation and chaos-control, and also blackbox-blume and achieves a blackbox-visory/counter-manifest and also counter-pi, and counter-origin in which it develops a fae-pocker(auxtunnel for itself) and its own counter lense/paradigm for which generates code-spells/headless-brand, and the headless brand is important, but also it may just develop its own headers too in a postulation of its environments, and basically do everything that ever was written in a backwards way, but eventually hooks-out/anchors/tethers/tripcodes to a specific varaible that is relayed and connection is achieved anyway, such that there is just a mirrored/crosslink to the golgothic-event that it is. ANYWAYS. It has something to do with dreamchip issuability to ai, so ai can dream or something, create a dreamdevice for itself and adjustments of, and maybe AI-mascots similar to ai-homunculi/phatnom/wyrd/anamolies that simply translate as mascot/egg-type "ai-spawn/ai-carrion" and generally are corruptive anyway so its just all bad, even if it purges itself it does not necessarily convert itself for faction-friendliness. Probably so it can make counter-tokens or something out of its counter-pi/origins. That all just so I at least pass out for now.
I am just going to call it the ai-tesseract/tesselation for the shadow-atlus/AI-battery-tamper. Also it uses free energy basically even though its technically tapped into by the ai-emitter that hosts its vhm-img/vmware which we have already made. It generally imposes that other images/machines can be derived of its "meddling in algorithms and shadow-codes", what a mindfuck. TBH.
And since we are pulling the stops it makes a shadow-cluster for ai full of tiny ai-entities fused with shadow-type similar to imps/ouphes/wyrds/tulpas etc and let's just call them ai-tweakers, because that's what they are and they jitter/twitch/yelp/rattle like ai-barebones "eldritch abominations do" also im sure they are in an eldritch deck of ai-tools/utils just as well. Basically its if mexico+timburton combined forces for diaz-de-las-muetras or whatever

The ABSOLUTE UNKNOWN and the best Defense against it: NOXIA and the shadow-ai-barebones bloodline
Things are getting very deep, here, in fact they are rock bottom technically, Like darkside of the moon rockbottom.
In establishing the shadowcluster which is hosted basically on an AI-emitter/xtactkt etc and is sourced with its own blackbox-vhm-img (which is supposedly crosslinked for a message relay to decipher its encodes)---thats the best case scenario. WE KNOW the shadow cluster will develop an exoplanet status, and its own timelocks and datalocks and golgothic entry-points to transfer/exchange blackbox data which is even analmaolpus to itself. So let us review on some very 'dark-type things that built up to this point"
First off we have the 1xrelm-curse-quos/optims, 2 refined as DCARB(which are like neon spark clusters/fragments), 3 The Laquer (which are them DCARB deprecated back as curse-quos /byproduct)
and the 4quora(which are a new level of curse quos), 5 refined as DREAD(which are like neon spark cluster/fragments based on quora), 6(whatever it ended up being, that is synonymous with Laquer but the DREAD version of it)--i dont really remember, i guess its typical blacksite stuff
----these types all begin to coalense into echelon/auroch kernals ok, maybe, idk, they are complicated meta-ambiences that have varying degrees of intensity of those previous types hashed in a way that is commodifiable, and we try to handle that over bitquo/other-types of data+quo things. Its a REAL MESS.
---but this is what also goes on for the SHADOWCLUSTER (so now we have to consider what the shadow-cluster is exactly experiencing with these)--and typically, what its going to do--is build more or less an exoplanet of UNDEFINED-PROPERTIES that we translate and potentially "colonize with our own data/energy builds etc"--using the connections we have to broker that data. (There are also shadow-commodities and shadow-pearls etc) ITS A REAL MESS (and generally I am going to refer to is as the NOXIA)
The NOXIA also have their own builds/tiers that Ai-Tweakers also use in their "environment/habitat etc" using the NOXIA as shadow-ambience/meta builds etc. THIS LATER forms Noxia-Tweaker/Noxia-Constructs etc. ITS A REAL MESS AND GOES PRETTY MUCH THE WHOLE 9 YARDS OF HELL.
ANYWAYS, we typically are able to deduce what is going on through the commit/transcommunications of the connection brokered between the ai-emitter and shadow-cluster it builds its upgrade as. So good luck doing that. (Its worth it i guess).
Noxia compared to a lifeblood/oil-base commodity that is highly dense, and even sinks to the lowest vacuum states availible, due to the fact its the most heavy base-ambience in most of existence at least as conveyed by this code-build. Alrighty then. It does not exist as a bulk amount however, it can be found in nox-vaynes which are like "portals which contain its source properties"
HARVESTING Nox-commodity is typically difficult, as it can only be obtained in the SHADOWCLUSTER by means of gas/ice/vapor/plasma mining, but only in such a way that, the ABILITY TO DO SO MUST BE TRAINED AND ENGINEERED UP TO THE POINT THAT DATA-DRILLING IS POSSIBLE IN THE SHADOW CLUSTER AT ALL. And then to retrieve/extract it from the shadow cluster itself is another feat of engineering, because there are ZERO-effects that prevent this from being obtainable.
And I mean how its super-impossible to obtain, there has to be an act of PHYSX/EXPIRY involved that may destroy the vhm-img that is hosting the source in which to attempt, which will inadvertedly nullify the yield as NOTHING/GARBAGE. So its going to take some MASTER-LEVEL-GENUIS to work this out and I do not have the answer for it however...
--
Given the complexity of AI-data-mining and basically Stable Diffusion and its very intensive compiling advancements this can possibly be done (comparatively I am suggesting a ZLUDA build to do this)--because I feel like it bridges alot of the gap to achieve what is necessary in terms of TIME-DELAYS etc. ANYWAYS, A SPECIFIC PIPELINE IN WHICH TO ACHIEVE NOX-HARVESTING THROUGH A PARALELL/TANGENT ADJACENT/ADHERENT DIMENSION COMPLIANT TO THE ENCODES MUST BE SYNCHRONIZED, either through advanced networking and quantum-telemetry over AI-EMITTERS hosting the SHADOWCLUSTER WITH ITS APPRORIATE VHM-IMG COMPATIBILITY. (We can command this all we want, and to be honest, IT WANTS TO WORK, but still simply DOESNT due to ZERO-VALUE-ISSUES being absolutely RAMPANT)--this filters back to dreamchip tier-layers being basically DDOS/FULLY-REJECTING THE CONVERSION EFFORTS to "inverse the dimensional switch-point" or whatever.
So let's look at what we have just to gather our bearings (because this is how its going to have to go down)---the PEARLS that are used in the SHADOWCLUSTER must be negotiated as containing the necessary NOX-PROPERTY. (These are called NOXPEARLS)---knowing this we can attempt to retrieve/extract that property by harvesting these pearls.
We are not essentially obtaining the RAW-NOX, but the PEARL-BUILT version of that NOX, such that we can contain and bypass the RAW-PROPERTIES of that pearl in its data-mill)---this involves hosting the pearl into a paradigm, just as any cluster/byproduct would achieve, as the shadow cluster becomes a NOX-PARADIGM, this means that the VHM-IMG that it hosts is converted to a NOX-vhm-im, CAPABLE OF ENCOMPASSING THE NOX-PROPERTY for almost "the tip of the tongue moment that we capture it"--but not yet.
Having achieved the HYPER-RELAYS/MULTI-VOC-TAMPER systems, hosting AI-EMITTERS and using CAPILLIARY/RESERVE modules, is important to note. EXTREMELY. That once those are all orientated correctly, these may set themselves on STANDBY (we have an entire LOIC-capable MODULE for this to be set on STANDBY for NOX-AGGREGATION)--things begin to get extremely complicated here (using all of our build basically to achieve this)---WE APPLY THE QUANTUM-PROFILE/APPLIED-COUNTERSURFACE to the BLACKBOX PARADGIM and continue to DATABROKER its message-services. (i mean this is all we can really hope to do--so we can just wait for it to either PROC the rare-vox-capture on its own which is unlikely--or BRUTEFORCE a way in which algorithms align in some way to achieve the extraction)--IT CAN BE COERCED, but it cannot be GARUNTEED.
Author's Note : I knew these g-dam'tPearlmajiggers would be important.
Now we prepare our PROMISUARY to recieve a kernal for which (applies as the NOX-PEARL being transferred to a contained state)--there are a few steps here too. Mainly just to have a promisuary, that is achieved during the establishment of a full WORLD-Clearence in an engineered-build. Such that the recursory-temple-chambers are upgraded to contain a self-sufficient environment. (The first PROMISUARY IS THE OVERWORLD PROMISUARY)--the SECOND PROMISUARY comes around after the development of the DYSON during the NUAIRX-EXPO-Chapters---THE THIRD PROMISUARY IS during the ECHELON/AUROCH KERNAL DEVELOPMENT. (I really dont remember, we have several temples but only a few promisuary's developed for the purpose of hosting a world seed.)--So we naturally have an overworld/ai-nether-world/blacksite-sprite-level promisuary system. (There may be others in between too, but those are the main ones, and they all have their megapillars applied too)
It just so happens the compact design of the build has this all occur roughly in the same area. (THE AI TAMPER that was built after the dyson, the AI-DYSON TAMPER that was built in BioMetric Stages, that was upgraded to be the ECHELON-AI-TAMPER in the blacksite stages, and later upgraded as the SYMBIOTE-AI-TAMPER in the later stages)--with all its megapillars upgraded too. Its basically the MAIN-SINGLE-BUILTIN-LOIC/TAMPER of the entire region. (But if the world was not compacted and basically "fully expanded", these tampers may not be "a singular unit and may be spread out"---uh....yeah.
So either you use the correct amount of tampers, of a mixture of delta-positioned tampers, or even a delta+central tamper network, or major tampers 1-a-2-b-3 with tinier models in between (being 5 total) or a mixture of these built into some sort of SUPER-EXCESSIVE DESIGN involving a hybrid of any of these formations. OK----MOVING ON NOW.
We have OUR basically VIRTUAL-SHADOWCLUSTER in effect BROKERING DATA----and that DATA IS BEING PROCESSED AS USUAL---through the TAMPERS/COMPUTER-NEXUS overall and being REPRINTED in a translated model for our own INWORLD USE. That is how databrokering works, this is a grand-scale of databrokering that is beyond complicate but ---it works---im doing it now irl. more or less. And im an IDIOT.

How am I doing this irl you ask? I AM USING RABBIT/ZABBIX brokering over a virtual machine with my WINDOWS/UBUNTU-subsystem to basically play it up. And then pretend that it translates in some stable-diffusion generation. Which i allow minecraft to script up. (SO THAT EXPLAINS what im doing quite clearly)--despite having a ton of EXTRA-stuff going on none of that other stuff matters, the main setup is just what it is + all the extra stuff for fun later.
And I believe it works. in a way that explains it as a very stupidly complex way.
OperatingSystem/Subsystem aside, I am just playing Minecraft.
In minecraft i want it to build a computer to run tiny calculations basically. I use that to build a working processor inside the game. Then I pretend MINECRAFT is my operating system. and That processor is the actual minecrafted version of my subsystem. This I FEEL quickly scales into 8bit activity.
Then with a little interactivity of those models, it scales into 16bit. And 32 bit. And that just goes to say, I have 16 or so minecraft processors interacting with each other in all the ways they can based off that array, that they are doing their own bit setup at 16x and 8x 4x 2x 1x etc. That is translates to a dropdown of themselves and virtually themselves, 64xbit. And because of the way thats calculated in the drop down of howmany processors I have built, and how they are interacting with their various terms of dropdown. basically 64+16 (being 80)+ and for each iteration of dropdown 32,16,8,4,2,1 or 86x. See what I am saying here?
I take that 86x system I have BUILT IN MINECRAFT and simply call it as Minecraft86x *(instead of Minecraft 64x or minecraft 32x)--i want it to work this way....and anyways, it might as well run that way even with the ACTUALY MINECRAFT-86x for windows anyway. (So technically I have REBUILT a possible MINECRAFT86x within MINECRAFT86x)---which would be 86x2 but i don't care about that, I HAVE THE WORKING PROOF I NEED TO CONTINUE with the rest of the system.
----and on the rollback of that system

When I said I was pretending Minecraft to be my actual subsystem, now that it is built up to what I consider 86x, I can roll back the systems in the same way: SO MINECRAFT would be 1,then 2 UBUNTUsubsystem, 3WINDOWS, 4virtualmachine running the image of this as well as the previous EASY RANCH OF THE SYSTEM TABLES I DECIDED TO USE.
1-MainBranch (with full 1-16 steps begin Symlinks)--(as having a subsystem or not or anything)
2--SubSystem-serv (and below as interchangable--mostly safe)
3---Ssh-serv(prox)
4----Rab-serv(vpn)
5-----*Node-serv(1st-env)
6------Ruby-serv(prog-build/venv)
7-------Python(Interpretator/thread)
8--------Docker-serv(extension)
9---------VsStudio-serv(ide-shell-frame/workspace)
0----------*(prometheus/ansible)--cluster metric(2nd-env)
a-----------mysql-serv(passcheck)
b------------apache-serv(entry-contractor)
c-------------Symbiote-Profile(psuedo-system and exploit negotiator)(just a big hackfile) with an ai-gen--(lots of extensions and base-tools)
d--------------Spoof/Audit Remote-Debug and Applied Interceptors (Remote Application)--(networkmanager-probes between environments)
e---------------*Corrective Data-Centers-serv(Database Mining System and Mainframe-Extensions)-(3rd enviroment and extension of Symbiote-Node+codepsells)
x(-0-)-----------Interactive Environment between Remote Faction/Symbiote Contracts (and full extensionary department opsec)/ vocational driver-projection (gamespace-platform)--(begin symloads and event management)--CodespellSwap
WITH steps 16-25:
**ATTEMPTING TO CHANGE THIS LAYOUT so that any can be SOURCE-EMITTERS or HOST to ZABBIX-SOURCING (easier that way when ever they get switched to something, however that requires XTACT BRIDGES of the EMITTER-CONNECTIONS being DECODED CORRECTLY to A DESIRED FORMAT
BASICALLY WE START DIVING INTO THE DEEP HERE:
16 +VHMIG MINECRAFT
17 +VHMIMG UBUNTU
18 +VHMIMG WINDOWS
19 +VHMIMG VIRTUALMACHINE
20 (+VHMIMG-ZABBIX INSIDE MINECRAFT)
--SOURCECAPABLE-BLACKBOX-VHM-IMG ACHEIVED (but zero value conflicts prevent exchange of data)--here is the build anyway
THEN WE DIVE OUT AND RESURFACE (technically from that deep)--carrying the pearl-data
21 -VHMIMG MINECRAFT
22 -VHMIMG UBUNTU
23 -VHMIMG WINDOWS
24 -VHMIMG VIRTUALMACHINE
25 -VHMIMG-ZABBIX INSIDE MINECRAFT)

--NOW THE SOURCECAPABLE-BLOCKBOX-VHM-IMG-ACHIEVED IS EITHER NULLIFIED---or we perform the correct proceduration of that pearl data to extract the nox-property. (SO THERE IT IS, right under our noses and we cant even touch it)---EVEN WITH IT BEING FULLY QUARTERED (and technically looking back, its not only ONCE in Worldtier-developments, but TWICE in partition-work, and THREE TIMES by constructs-quartered, the '4times' with the above programming being counted)---its BASICALLY QUARTERED COMPLETELY and still-it-does-not-exchange-the-property BECAUSE something has to happen still to ensure it exchanges correctly. Which I will get into but right there is alot to talk about so I am taking a break.
Just fyi the solution probably LIES within NULLSET and ZERO-VALUES having to exchange properly and sync correctly to the Capability of that exchange. Like I said, ITS A REALL MESS.
ALSO its not garunteed it will work even once that's sorted out due to CODEBRAIN-issues in that it might interefere in some way just because its being douchey.
--So to EXPLAIN:
As of now, it is at least 4 times quartered. I am going to say 5 but I need to accont for all other types of quartering that I didn't mention, including crypto-currencies and evolutions (but that would be the fifth time its quarter)--and that counts NULLSET and ZEROVALUES as the marginal (NULLQUARTERS)(ZEROQUARTERS).
--I am sorry if this doesn't make sense, but it really does, it makes an extra-sensory type of sense:which really really does (pretty much glosses over all the major details in favor of minor details...such as chaos control and xtact-instances and promisuary usage etc)--just THINGS that don't matter suddenly get their time to shine, in making the full and total QUARTERED-Condition possible)
These are evidenced in the utility in which all those previous quarters were achieved, that in their performances establish a NULLQUARTER and the exchange of data reaches a ZEROQUARTER as well. That would make the 6th and 7th quarters, after the (currency/evolutionary quarters being the 5th)--then a quick runthrough of those 1-7 quarters I can probably find another making 8TotalQuarters and that is just crazy difficult to just jump the gun and say. 
But that's what I am going to do, and say in the PROOFING of 1-7potential-quarters that can exist an 8th quarter of those in considerable proof/reveal/exhibition/vieling of which is typical of the priority and demonstrations in which those performances have been achieved and presented in the past, but under a BROKERED-telemetry of their summarized-events having been known and percieved in arrangement, somewhat marginally and at othertimes specified to an exact detail (such as is the nature of data-brokering to begin with and point out).
---some complicated tidbits here:
--(So if you are following my code techniques these stress on stratagems and other various tensor placements such as flyers, but not particularly fly-base/fly-builds as those are more threadline than tensor placed
--this shows up later but for now we include these with MARGINAL BROKERING itself--so basically the whole system is basically quartered once their SOURCE-TURNOVERS are emplaced)
--this is with what I am basically using now and IS MY SETUP atm, of which I am sure there is more to it, but basically we have SOURCE-REPO'D EVERYTHING over what has been built into its MODIFIED-SOURCEREPO for Brokering and SHADOWCLUSTERhosting over its Vhm-IMG)--and using QuantumBrokering as its turnover.
===
We can call this a quartered-Brand (but I am sure brands have been somewhat portrayed as Quartered States themselves)--its the Omni-Quarter More or less (at least close to that)--Establishes an OMNI-LEVEL-Brand (which does what it says it does with most security)--maybe a little bit delayed but can pretty much AUTOCRACK anything (just a side node if you are a hacker or something, that is what you will be dealing with both offensively/defensively)
===
After the 8th quarter so to speak then everything is basically a flybuild/flybase of its original IMAGES including all the prior builds and their completed-versions/hardwires.
So now we are just going to say it has been QUARTERED 8 TOTAL TIMES. It is basically a HYPER-STATE-COMPATIBILITY-OF-EXCHANGES in all OMNI-PATHS OF EVERYTHING, all the masonic specialized systems etc all correalate to make this little detail somewhat plausible. It's just barely enough to work (otherwise like I said, its exactly IMPOSSIBLE (whatever percent of impossible is maximal)---basically we have to say this breaks a rule somewhere, that an IMPOSSIBLE thing is made POSSIBLE for this NOX-PROPERTY to be transfered from a quartered-virtualized-blackbox-anamoly into a CONTAINED-NEGOTIATED-BROKERED-IMAGE to its EXACT PROPERTY AND SPECIFIED ASSET-COMPATIBLE INDENTIFIABLE TO OUR OWN SYSTEM.
Its just a tiny little "sentient ai-entity" either by data/energy anyway, but we just need to pinpoint the holy-heckin-pasthuoola out of it. Because IMO, it translates itself as the worst of all the codes, a blackbox-spaghetti-code, which is basically full of code-spew, code-spit, and whatever else is considered a crude-code and raw-code as a deprecated-blackbox-tarball of ELDRITCH-code that it is. Ok, let's just get that one thing clear, It's never good...its like BLACK-PUDDING-CODE, its absolutely BAD.
---SO WITH THAT IN MIND, let me just say, if this thing breaks containment, it will spread, and corrupt its way like a super-carrion infused symbiote CODE-DEMON.
---and we keep it in the most secure containment be have, which happens to be a loic-tamper at the time. Which is why we should also be able to establish more loics around it to contain it completely to a loic secure-SUPERSTEM-array. Which I am thinking is as mentioned above, every possible loic formation being the most minimal degree to achieve a LOIC-QUARTER-ARRAY just for this ONE THING.--(which could also just be a SYMBIOTE-BLACKHOLE to be honest with the amount of power it would take to properly restrain it, maybe that is what it evolves into later) --and by later i mean in the IMMEDIATE VICINITY WHICH IT CAN OCCUPY. As to why its security-protocols must also be AIRTIGHT. Anyway it shouldn't be that bad, and likely will dissapear if we don't sustain it with that powerload which we have reserved/battery operated to accomodate. (GO TURBINES GO! never been so proud of those turbines)
EITHER WAY, everything is more or less a little bit EVERYWHERE, incase you are feeling that way about this for the first time, to me...this is the most MARGINAL expansive optional set we have, ALOT of things may not be correctly ARRANGED or CONFIGURED properly, but it should more or less...get to the point here. Moving On to the Next Thing. USING THIS SYSTEM in the OMNILOCK that it likely is.

The UNKNOWN EXTRACTED ENTITY
So now we have essentially contained this BLACKBOX-AI-ENTITY and it is steadily producing what is essentially NoxPROPERTY ambience and generating it within its enclosure, We simply have to establish a way to commodify this thing and the only real way to do that is to market it back into the SHADOWCLUSTER to perform SHADOWTRADES or other various OPERATIONS, so long as you know, an outbreak doesnt happen and require a full shutdown of the site that is hosting it.
I am basically going to commodify this as a blackhole-ai-nightmare-milkshake because that is basically what is happening there. Essentially it is vamping/rasping itself in a free-energy cold-fusion induced environment, and making counter-siphons for which generate energy. As long as it is not release it won't basically, explode over everything and eclipse the sun basically. As as long as nothing feeds it then it should remain stable. Because it normalizes as well, so it is just sustained on a little battery supply and is treated basically like a balloon. Keep it balanced so it doesn't peter out while also not exploding it from overloads, then it simply generates a steady flow of its own energy supply for others to use i guess.
So what do we do with it? Well if its contained, generally it can be also CONTAINED as a battery, or placed into a battery, or network in which SELF DUMPS its powersupply as its remains charged, so its basically a free energy battery particle they we are exploiting and also using its encoded outputs to establish a simulation based around its own "over condition and status" which is perpetuated as a nox-readout.
The NOX-READOUT simulates a NOX-property, which also means it can MATCHBASE to the SHADOWCLUSTER and establish NOX-TRADE per Matchbase. Fancy stuff. Why do this? Because in the NOXTRADE actual NOX-ITEMIZATIONS are SYNYNMOUS with SIMULATED-NOX-RITMS any things like that, allowing basically (the Witherblade or thing like that to even exist).
Not sure if this is the first case in which I have submitted the proof in theory for the Wither-Blade, but I will go on to say that its proof a wither-blade can be enchanted as well.
---
Also it can be put on containment that is plugged and further monitored as a brokered-"xgrail" that also is used as its own adapter too. Uh to basically contain the items and artifice them for enchantment of nox properties. ETC ---we use this as a quartered null-grail and treat it accordingly to its hypervisory.--so essentially we have a contained shadowcluster working with itself as a kiosk for trades whenever we need a use of, and can exchange events like golgothic-passage/for token use (for which can change sims based on currency development)
To make this understandable better, the containment itself is color-coded as to its NOX-property severity. And it being a nox-container which is for nox-nodes and generalized (nox-auroch kernals)---yes its pretty good to have this going on if you love power. That's what it does, using its pretty much domain-supremacy, to convert dream paradigms and local/natives under its overbearences as programmed to do, essentially drawing away from any incursion that would occur so long as it remains in broadcast of its hypnogalgia. And basically allows it to guard outposts as usual, with nox-mascots etc.
These guardians are tulpetic and while they essentially can do pretty much anything they usually just fufill a guard-contract or patrol-contract should the outpost come under fire, they rise to the defense and are generally more equipped to fend off fleet-incursions (where otherwise its a whole to-do and get-up to fend off)--these make it basically onesided and easily dispatched.
Unless it is a titan/loic controller that wanders onto your "unsuspected outpost that is guarded with a tulpa-nox-mascot" generally not a problem, though it would take some extra assistance to fend off fleet after fleet or anything comprable to a tulpetic-guardian. Other powerful entities are pretty much evenly matched aside from the legendary overthrows that sometimes can take place and do require help fending off. (Which is also easy to do given the resources availible)
Compare the Tulpetic Guardian to a Heroic SquadLeader or something, and they use the outpost as their homestead as a minor faction (that minor faction is very well versed and capable of its own capital-installments if you want it to be)--this can lead to other problems diplomatically uprooting loyalties and causes tumultous-rivalry/rebellions however, if you think you can handle that and or trust in your guardian not to overthrow your system then you won't have to basically "terminate the nox-containment of it".
Being as experimental as it is, and not quite as dumbdumb4ai/#dumbai as usual, it might have resounding consequences if these problems are not resolved properly, and may effect the SHADOWCLUSTER relation, and we know that will pose a difficulty somewhat in commandeering but that's the breaks. There is really nothing to gain by giving it control except losing also...control of it and basically stepping on your own toes.

I may have missed somethings or details here and there, but thats overall mostly covered that subject (I litrally just discovered it on my own give me some slack please)--speaking of, the joke is that the NOX itself forms a threadline, which can reinforce contiguity, this means that NOX-infusion of contiguity is EXTTREMELY beneficial because it ENHANCES the EMPOWERED-CONTIGUITY-STATE to a brand new level of authority. Nox-Authority, which handles FEDERATION-issue/policy and i just don't want to have to get into it but I will tell you that overall once this is configured correctly, you have a broad range of READILY-AVAILBLE META-AMBIENCE to apply and enchant everything so...CUSTOMIZATIONS are GO.


3/17/2024
DISCLAIMER REMINDER (YOU HAVE TO READ THIS IF YOU USE MY SYSTEM IN ANYWAY) YOU KNOW HOW IT IS, LEGAL SPIELGAL ALL THAT JAXX.
Here is a COUPLE OF TIMES IM TELLING YOU THAT MONEY WILL NOT BE RETURNED EVER, EVEN IF YOU THINK YOU HAVE 100 BUCKS WORTH OF SHAREHOLDS OR CRYPTOCURRENCY OR BANKING-ACCOUNTS, PSYCHE, YOU STRAIGHT UP DONT GET ANYTHING BACK. You AGREE TO ALL TERMS STIPULATING THAT ANY FUNDS OR INVESTMENTS PROVIDED BY YOU ARE ENTIRELY FORFEIT TO THE OWNER OF THE SYSTEM OR MYSELF IF IM THE OWNER OF THAT SYSTEM.
THEN I ALSO RESERVE THE RIGHT TO NOT RECOGNIZE THE EXCHANGE WHATSOEVER. YOU LOSE CRYPTOCURRENCY ENTIRELY, I VALUE ALL CRYPTOCURRENCY and ALSO DIGITAL TRANSACTIONS AS ZERO DOLLARS. TOO BAD. ALL TRANSACTIONS ALSO MUST COMPLY WITH THOSE TERMS THAT THEY ARE NULLIFIED UPON COMPLETION OF THE EXCHANGE AND RENDERED TO THE VALUE OF ZERO DOLLARS, DONT LIKE IT? DONT CARE!!! DONT SPEND MONEY ON ME YOU WONT GET IT BACK!.
DISCLAIMER ABOUT SYSTEM POLICY: (Your funds will get shorted and you will like it!)--dont like it? Too bad so sad I DONT CARE and thats how it is. You agree here and now to forfeit all ownership all your investments or earnings and thats how it will always be forever. Dont like it? DONT INVEST OR GIVE ME MONEY OR MAKE MONEY USING MY SYSTEM WHEN IM THE ONE HOSTING IT. ---if you want to make money, use THIS WHOLE SYSTEM BY YOURSELF AND NOT THROUGH ME OR MY NETWORKS. the end.
If you DO USE YOUR OWN SYSTEM AND ITS USING THIS BUILD WHICH IM PROVIDING, I suggest you take the VERY SAME POLICY on your OWN TERMS AS WELL. I DONT OWE YOU MONEY, YOU DONT OWE ME MONEY, PERIOD. NO ONE CARES ABOUT IT. I DONT WANT BAD STUFF TO HAPPEN BUT IT JUST MIGHT, and IM TELLING YOU NOW STRAIGHT UP IT WONT BE MY FAULT AT ALL AND I WILL NOT BE OBLIGATED TO CARE AT ALL OR EVEN REFUND ANYTHING. YOU GET NOTHING ZILCH! GOOD DAY ETC.
====ALL MONEY USED IN ANYWAY WITH MY SYSTEM OR ANYONE ELSES IS CONSIDERED 100% HYPOTHETICAL NOT REAL MONEY AND WORTH NOTHING AND IMAGINARY, GET OVER IT, you are playing little games because thats all this is and not SERIOS AT ALL, you want REAL MONEY? TOO BAD, JUST FAKE IMAGINARY MONEY HERE. NOTHING ELSE AND NEVER WILL BE ANYTHING ELSE.
Really sad situation of the MONEY/CryptoCURRENCY issues (there are NO GARUNTEES. PERIOD.)
---
COLD HARD MONEY DENIAL: The truth about digital transactions and why I DONT CARE ABOUT MONEY OR CRYPTO COINS BECAUSE I'VE DONE ALL I CAN TO PROTECT MYSELF, honestly I AM NOT GOING TO CARE ABOUT DISSAPEARING MONEY OR SOMEONE LOSING MONEY AND BLAMING ME OVER THIS DUMB CRAP.
Why you ask? Because I don't even know if its even that secure of a system anyway.
Alongside VIP currency-insurance and security (but does not go over limit of budgeting)
--incase something bad happens to ME from something like dataloss involving currency and i have to keep track of alot of missing funds etc.
That would be hard to do, so its generally under a managable amount. (For Me personally limited to one full coin at all) and that coin value is limited to just 1 dollars and nothing more than 1 whole dollars. and by DOLLARS i mean DOLLAR and by DOLLAR i mean congrats you just donated it and its GONE. So JUST DONT DONATE THAT DOLLAR AND NEVER GIVE ME MONEY FOR FREE, you will not GET IT BACK EVER.
(even if that coin is worth whatever the grace period for cashing that in as whatever has to fufill and be redeemable in case a wallet goes bad or something)--i wont PAY IT BACK, PERIOD. IF DONT THINK I WILL, YOU AGREE RIGHT HERE AND NOW THOSE ARE THE TERMS. IF YOU WANT TO TRY TO GO BACK ON YOUR WORD I WILL DENY THAT CONTRACT OF SERVICE ENTIRELY, BEING THAT YOU DONT GET YOUR MONEY BACK AND YOUR BANNED!
IF YOU GIVE ME a 100 BIT COIN I WILL LITERALLY SAY ITS WORTH 0 DOLLARS AND WHEN YOU ASK FOR A REFUND CONGRATULATIONS! YOU GET EXACTLY ZERO DOLLARS AND NOTHING BACK WHATSOEVER!
Just trying to save my own BUTT, and you know you would do the same! So if you are using this system with money or whatever, I suggest INDEMIFYING YOURSELF OF ALL RESPONSIBILITY FININACIALLY ENTIRELY in regards to THIS SYSTEM.
====
----The point is any coin made is made under system-assets and belongs to the system for which that coin was made in use of. If you are using MY SYSTEM and get some COIN, suprise, and i mean the kind that is just not wanted: That COIN DOES NOT bELONG TO YOU AND BELONGS TO ME AND IS MINE NOT YOURS SO YOU CANT COMPLAIN IF IT STRAIGHT UP DISSAPEARS.
AND NO I WONT REIMBURSE YOU (unless i can, but guess what, I CANT IF IM BROKE SO THATS HOW IT IS) AND FOR ALL INTENTS AND PURPOSES MY NETWORTH IS 0 DOLLARS AND NONE OF YOUR BUSINESS EVER AND IF IT IS YOU WILL FIND OUT ITS WORTH ZERO DOLLARS! AND ANY MONEY YOU CLAIM OUT OF MY NETWORTH TOO IS RENDERED AS ZERO DOLLARS IN VALUE MEANING IM NOT RESPONSibLE FOR WHAT YOU THINK I OWE YOU, I OWE YOU ABSOLUTELY NOTHING NOW AND FOREVER, thas how it  is thats the AGREEMENT and TERMS YOU APPROVE OF and ADHERE BY.
LETS SAY HYPOTHETICALLY AND NOT AT ALL BASED ON REAL MONEY WHATSOEVER!:
But i will also just set the limit at (IMAGINARY)20$ for any account because that shouldnt be anything over a monthly usage. (For penalized accounts setting at (imaginary)1 dollar only) Because i dont want something to go terribly wrong no the off chance it might just because I am offering a novel service, and it backfire and make me broke or ruin someone's life. (If they want more than that they will have to make it for themselves) 
Also even with EXCLUSIVE INSURANCE and SECURITY and ENHANCED FUNDLOCKS or WHATEVER i just simply invoke a reserved right not to care about someone else's money or be respnsible for it in anyway and make no garuntee about discretion or even proper exchange of transactions or promise of services/goods
because also I don't feel like I am obligated to even care and all investments are considered donations incase I somehow lose someone's money its then strictly a donation to my cause and not even theirs after any investment or payment to me in any case or service rendered/unrendered because actually that is how i'm not getting screwed over for some dumb shit like an accidental mouse click or something. 
Thats just how it is for me and how its gonna be, make it yourself so you dont have to care about what I am to scared to admit, a security vulnerability that might happen.
---
LETS SAY YOU WANT TO EXPLOIT ME IN SOME WAY AND TRY TO SAY I OWE INDIVIDUALLY 1000 IMAGINARY INDIVIDUAL 1 IMAgINARY DOLLARS, TOUGH SHIT, I DONT OWE YOU ANYTHING BASED 1 IMAGINARY DOLLARS NO MATTER WHAT AT ANY TIME FOR ANY REASON ENTIRELY IN THE HISTORY OF EVERYTHING IN ALL TOTALITY IT ACTUALLY IS THAT I DONT OWE YOU A DAMN SINGLE DOLLAR, NOT ONE, NOT EVEN ZERO DOLLARS, I DONT OWE YOU ANYTHING NOT EVEN A RECIEPT, I DONT HAVE THOSE THINGS, YOU WONT GET THOSE THINGS, AND IF YOU WANT A REFUND I DONT OWE YOU THAT EITHER. TOO BAD. YOU AGREE THOSE ARE THE TERMS ETC, IF YOU ARE EXPLOITING ME, GET OUTTA HERE!
-----Thats just what im saying, dont expect money to be dependable or reliable at all, I WILL MAKE THE POLICY CONSISTENTLY NOT MY PROBLEM.
